
lithicacity.com	
HomeLand of BethlehemThe Other WorldOf LightKingdoms of SunlightA Garden and River - Land of LightMore
The Diary of Lucifer - Beta Archives
	 	

	 	

The Following Flowers




Lucifer
















Now seven times a person must pay, seven times being the multiplication, when a person is disrespectful, and so then those who do not have the money for it, they will be sold into slavery for a time by the Lord, for they were a scoundrel.




Now the Christ has said him who forgives debts, the Lord will forgive his debts.




Now then not all are children of the kingdom, for they are not free, for they must pay their debts, for the Lord will require what they owe, and yet them who are forgiving the debts of others, the Lord will not require it from them because they are judged according to their own judgment.




Now them who are not free, that they must be honourable, repaying debts, they are not children of the kingdom, but they are disciples of the kingdom.




Now seven times a person pays for their disrespect and yet them who do not judge the thing are not being robbed by the Lord.




Now the children of the kingdom, they are free, and yet what thing really disrespectful are they ever? Now they are free, and the young are learning, those with less knowledge that is sacred, and yet them who perform, them who have the mastery, are they not held to the great judgment though they have the greater rewards?




Now then is not then David King of the Army and second highest king at this time, being the king, and the Emperor, the god Emperor, who is Leto, he is favouring David most if he is a man who is doing all the Lord asks, for what man is there like David? Now yet if the neo nazis become as Claudius to Marcus Arrillius, yet the neo nazis are not the son or the heir of the Emperor, for they are priests. Now then the priests must focus upon fulfilling what they must to their own people, for they must not have their eyes ever upon another people, but upon their own society, giving honour to what should be given honour, for the prince is better than them, for he has learned their things as a very small child and they have not endured what a prince endures, for nothing they know of it, and so the priests must fulfill to their own society, for it is the direct way, that they will be Levi, for they will throw away the bowing that is Hitler, for Hitler had the nation, and yet they are part of another society, for they will consider their own people, and should be respected, for the Emperor says, there shall be no misanthropy in my land, for it is a decease, and no misanthropy will be found anywhere, for the health of every place, and the bowing of the priests is because of the misanthropy they did not consider, in not keeping their eyes on their own people, fulfilling to their own society. Now surely men will not find them acceptable if they are not honouring and fulfilling to their own people, for they will be called an abomination if they are having misanthropy towards their own people. Now then if Nephtali is not keeping to their own rightful land, by mala, for it is a thing of mala, yet they are profaning, and it is as violence that they are trespassing, and yet if Nephtali is at peace and choosing the direct way with God, what offence will be found with them? Now as for what is slaves, what is dung, what is the devil and all the kingdom of the devil brought together, it does not belong, and God is the Universe, and he is whole, perfect light, and yet the devil, he must be removed from the whole and perfect light and cast into hell, that all that are making up the body of the devil, all his beasts, they must be thrown into hell. Now the atheists say, nature does it, and they look to the ground, and the religious say, nature is part of the mystery of God, and they look to the Heavens, for atheists and religious are parellel perfectly, for the flip of the coin is part of the mystery of God, and atheists will say nature selected, and religious will say that God selected.




Now then profane not the morning with loud greeting, for the morning is the Devar Hashem, the Sabbath.




Now the angel is Emor, New Rome, and all that Rome erred in the New Rome will be right in, or it is the plan.




Now anarchy is the filling of law, and anarchy is congruent with law, keeping law, for where there is error, anarchy catches law and keeps it, and so the law is within the liquid of anarchy, and the two are together, for anarchy supports the law and upholds society and the law, and law is the heavy stuff, the rock that is solid. Now nihilism, another type of anarchy, it is only the extinction of all people, and it is also a type of wickedness, for it is called wickedness, and it does not understand, for it has very bad understanding.




Now then without the liquid of anarchy, the rocks are left bare, the people are eradicated, even to death, and only the rocks of the law remain, for a physician has said, the liquid of anarchy, the fluid must remain, or the people, the cells of it, will be flushed out and killed by the misanthropy, and only the law, the rocks, will remain. Now then there shall be no misanthropy in my land, for there is no human rights for misanthropy, for by logic, misanthropy has no rights or any laws protecting it, for the tie, which is not a tie, goes to what is not misanthropy, and so it is by the law of the planet, because primitive people were not selected for extinction, but the Lord selected many dinosaurs to go extinct. Now though the brontosaurus, the doctor, is not familiar with humans, yet it must be, for he must do things that are not really human, and yet think not the brontosaurus evil, for he takes leaves from the tree, and he is one of the good dinosaurs. Now those dinosaurs that are the devils, yet they have been selected for extinction.




Now profane no day, and profane not the night, and profane nothing that is sacred, that does not belong in war. Now what you profane, so you are lacking what your mouth says, for it is proven by understanding that you speak of yourself.




Now projection is profane, for to profane is wicked, and profane opens its mouth with projection.




Now all will follow the direct way with God, to not profane, or if they are all following there will be no disrespect, and there will be no misanthropy. Now there is a person who sells themselves into slavery, for the Lord does it, with their mouth, and there is them who sell their soul with their mouth, to take the number of the beast. Now such must even surpass slaves in insolence.




Now the evening is the sign of New Jerusalem, the bride of the Devar Hashem, and they were they not brought forth on the first day?




Now the fourth day is called Romance, and its city is Emor, and Emor is all that Rome should have been and it does right what Rome did wrong.




Now Tuesday is the day of the atheist, for it does the things of the Earth, and it digs into the Earth.




Now then a teenager even would know to cover your mouth to not sneeze on people, and to not play their own music too loud when they are required to respect reality of society, and yet them who are not disrespectful, it is no one else's business what their own music is. Now it is only, not striving to be be disrespectful, and to sneeze is misanthropy or wickedness that is your own problem, your own misunderstanding, that you at least remember the truth and cover your mouth to not sneeze upon others. Now is it easier to say, do not give wicked judgments, for they are not judgments, but evidence of your own failings, for rather, if you are sick, cover your mouth. Now the children are free, but teenagers are able to learn these things, they who are learning, and they are still learning.




Now if the disease of misanthropy is found in some places, and yet the people are not people fully misanthropy, yet no misanthropy can be tolerated in any place, for it is a dangerous chemical, a wicked disease, and it is even Beelzebub, for Beelzebub is made of misanthropy, being fully profane.




Now if a neo nazi gang will not choose the direct way, to be respecting all that is their own people and their own society, then it will be that misanthropy is their way, and misanthropy is also to be a pedophile, for the two are with each other, for paedophilia is the bride of misanthropy, then that neo nazi gang, being abhorrent, that it cannot be tolerated by men, because it is misanthropy, it will be removed that another gang will likely take its place that is neo nazi, for the gang will not be remembered as a neo nazi gang, but as an Incel gang that was not honest. Now so the neo nazis will honour their own people that they are not called misanthropy. Now if there is not misanthropy with them, they will be able to be called Aron, by those who is pleases to call them Aron.




Now then if the priesthood becomes Claudius, being misanthropy, that they would seek to kill Marcus Arrilius, yet they are not what is called white supremacy anymore if they are not respecting the whole of their own people, for they will not be able to be called Aron, but they will then be called misanthropy, and the priesthood is not son of the Emporer, who is the god Emporer, that David is the second highest to the Emporer, for the Emporer has chosen David to be king, for there is none like David who does all the Lord asks of him. Now what did Cladius do? But he killed Christians, and he may not be king, may not be Emporer, and yet if the priesthood is respecting their own people, the princes, who are better than them, and the realm of men to be men, than they are in the direct way, for they are respecting their own people, joined to their own people, and they will be called Aron by some, and what cannot be committed to the name of God, honouring their own people, it will be considered injustice, for the priesthood should be committing its actions to the name of God, for the men have the judgment of God, where they are in the direct way, not profaning, not being wicked, and such are the men of the nation, and the priesthood is committing its actions to the name of God.




Now the covenant of the neo nazis, who may be called Aron, is it not with God? Now then the Lord has created all people, for first came the Jews, the streamlet, and then the large river, being all the people, for the streamlet was fulfilled, for all the things were fulfilled and it culminated in the Christ, and then all things were fulfilled for another period, it is culminated in the angel, for the signs that the angel quotes, they are the happenings of all the people who were not Jews, for the people have prophesied prior, and they have been with God who has directed them, and the signs have been fulfilled prior to the coming of the angel that the angel quotes their stories, some of them, that were brought about as part of the fulfillment. Now so the streamlet is the core, the centre, and the word, the bible, it is the Christ, the Devar Hashem, and the angel is the river, for the diary is the river that surrounds Him, and the word is the centre, for the Christ is the word, and the Sabbath. Now so the curtain of Romance, that is sacred, it surrounds the centre, that is the word, for the Christ is the Sabbath who reigns. Now then will you not clear out the trash from you by the keeping of the Sabbath, for you have what they call head lice, do you not? But then clear out the head lice from you by the keeping of the Sabbath, for though base people have as if been a mockery of things, yet their trash will be cleared, will it not, by the keeping of the Sabbath. Now when the people are keeping the Sabbath, the Sabbath is keeping the six days of them, that the trash is gone from the six days and the people are able to have rest for the six days because of the day of rest. Now then the day of rest should not be a burden for you, that you work as you approach the evening, but keep the Sabbath by breaking it, that you remain in rest, for it is not really work, what is rest for you, and you know what is really work and what is not, for it is the tree of the six days that you do not desire on the day of rest, that you break the Sabbath a little to not eat of the tree of the six days. Now each must know what is right for them in order to keep the Sabbath, for you should not be questioning what is right for others that they have rest.




Now then the agnostic, they are a child or adolescent of the kingdom, and the adolescent is not necessarily free, for the adolescent of the kingdom must be a man to some extent, paying his debts, doing good for good, and yet the polytheist agnostic, who has a false version of the Lord as God, who has the shapes of the clouds as their idols, and actors as more than things to only quote, but as if they were real, placing them where they do not belong, who have a nation and temporary propaganda as their religion, who are polytheists, having the religion of garden slaves, they are them who eat what is called the burger, and their kings are the burger, and yet the god Emperor has said, the people will have expensive dining as their standard, for the burger is Beelzebub, a foolish thing of trash, and of ignorance and cheapness, for the people will have expensive dining as their standard, and they will have a great many courses, for the time of the agnostic burger is over, and the burger king should not be eaten, but rejected, for the burger king was against racism, and he fed the beast that caused all the problems the burger king hated, and the burger king was against war, but he fed the unnecessary wars, that there would be more, and the burger king was against torture, but he fed the beast that would bring more torture when it was wicked, and the burger king was against abuse, but he fed the beast that would bring about much more abuse. Now the burger should not be eaten, but the god Emporer has said, the people will have expensive dining as their standard, and they will have many courses, for the priesthood, David, the tithe, the rejecting of the scoundrel, these are all things of the expensive dining, and Nephtali, the respect of decency, even the diary, these are things of the expensive dining. Now so the angel has slapped away the burger from the hands of some that they are angry, and yet is the angel not strong and will he not ignore them, for they must go and indulge in the expensive dining that is given to them freely, and yet the angel slaps the burger from their hands, for they will not anymore eat of the giant burger that is Beelzebub, the garden slave agnostic, for it is also Kir and Kursh. Now the polytheist agnostics, they have great delusions of grandeur and they are burger kings of many men, and yet they are ignorant meal, inexpensive, bad for the body, for there are expensive burgers with the expensive dining, and they will be better for them.




Now at the risk of upsetting the burger king, Muslims may be in America, but they should not be in England, for it is environmental destruction, and yet is not Scotland acceptable for Muslims? Now then hear the things of the expensive dining. Now will not the Muslims listen to the angel? But England is different, for Muslims are not doing well to be in England, and yet they are acceptable for America, also for Eretz Chadrack.




Now them who are trying to be things, but are not able to be any of those things, they are not what they are even in their pretending, for they are striving in most ways, for they are not one of eight of a thing, but even that which they strive in is not. Now so then what is found that is true?




Now there is them who survive by becoming of great ego, else, because they are not anything, they would have been flushed from the Earth. Now they are not smart, not beautiful, not honourable, not righteous, not anything, and so they survive by becoming of great ego, becoming profane, and they are with much misanthropy, the bride of which is pedophilia.




Now then profane not the curtain of Romance, for it is the curtain of fire around the Sabbath, for the curtain, too, is sacred.




Now be not too smart in action, indeed not smart in judgments, that you would be wicked, for you are right to do the right thing, and all who rebel are rebelling against God, and they will be wicked other places, that in your war though millions rise up in rebellion, yet you defend the city in which the Lord dwells and will not then the Sabbath reign over all of it? Now they will be wicked in other places, so that for a single thing, if they rebel, you do not say, let the crowd decide, as Rome would, but you say, we defend the city of God against an rebellion of Beelzebub and his army, for no cause is good enough, no excuse valid, that again he is kicked from his grave and goes to war for no reason, and so then we have opportunity to make the Earth more peaceful, for in their insolence, so then they will be cut down, and it is the way of Emor, and not of Rome. Now who has stood for this? But has not the Lion, America, stood for this? Now then the angel also stands for this. Now the serpent says, let Eretz Chadrack be your tree for shade, for though the Lion cannot do some things, unless it be wickedness for the Lion, yet the serpent of the tree, he will make alliances for you that you might benifit, and so then you will be the mighty and the serpent will be peace that you not have to fight as much, for Eretz Chadrack will be the tree of the Lion and it has Dagon, the serpent.




Now then the restaurant burger, it is not a burger, but it is the ways of righteousness and of the Lion, and of the Lord, and Dagon is wiping away the cheap and ignorant burger, that the people are having the expensive meals of many courses as their standard, and included is the expensive burger.




Now then some men are as a vagina, others as a phallus, and some women are as a vagina, and others as a phallus, and so then judge for yourself what is true, what types of people are well for each other, for did not you not expect Dagon to be a dragon, to be unfamiliar with humans in his offering of wisdom, that he speaks to you of anthropic things? Now so Dagon will be crude, to be unfamiliar with humans.




Now blaspheme an angel, for you profane the Heavens? Now for disrespect will you not be robbed seven times the amount?




Now them who cannot pay, they throw their children into the fire, and yet there is the number of the beast, for a person cannot afford to sell their soul.




Now the Lord has selected the dinosaurs, many of them, for extinction, and the tribe of primitive people not primitive, he has selected for extinction, for they were not human as primitive people were, but they were fit to be slaves, and the Lord has selected the things of the time of the Christ on Earth for extinction, for the things of that time were defeated by the Christ, that they were fulfilled by that time and fully defeated, that the Lord selected the evil that was defeated for extinction, for there is no more persecution of religion, no more challenging freedom of religion, no more speaking evil against the freedoms of people concerning religion, for these things had been fulfilled by the time of the Christ, and the Christ defeated them totally, and so these things have been selected for extinction long prior, that Beelzebub is kicked from his grave again, and challenges reality, for these things are buried under the next layer of rock, for the dinosaurs were buried and then these things were buried being another layer of rock. Now then Beelzebub has no right to challenge what is buried, to challenge reality, for he speaks nothing in his challenging, for the words of it are extinct also, that the words are nothing, nonsense, not even a vapour. Now it is the time of the better enlightenment, for misanthropy first was buried, then dinosaur levels of brutality, not familiar with humans, and then primitive people came, the humans, and the things prior had been buried. Now then terrorism against an angel is incoherent, and terrorism against an angel now is incoherent, and the angel leaves every man behind who falls behind, for they will be devoured by the waters, for they must learn and grow stronger in understanding. Now as for the children of the kingdom, yet what flood will take them, and what can even happen to them? Now then religion has gained victory, and atheism has gained victory, and all are at the standard level, all being having their righteous resting place that may not be disturbed, for many layers are beneath that resting place, many layers of buried things, and it is because of the Christ, if the atheists will believe it, and so then who disturbs the resting place of righteous, of the wall, that is the atheists, or of Zion, they are coming up through the layers of rock to wage incoherent war, with an extinct language that means nothing and so then if they emerge with buried things to commit terrorism, so they are up from beneath the Earth, and they are justly and dutifully returned to the ground from which they came. Now so then David is chosen to be king, and the names of them who committed terrorism must be written down, for they must all be dealt with by justice, for if they committed terrorism, against the wall, that you think does not need to be defended because it is a great wall, or against Zion, that you believe must be defended more, yet if any has committed terrorism against the wall, in wickedness, or against Zion, in wickedness, then their names are written down, for not one is allowed to escape justice when there is a time of justice to make the land clean, for because they disturbed the resting place, they were from the ground and they must return to the ground.




Now then the officers, the philistines, they are with Saturn, and they are those in command, and David is him who is doing the combat, for the philistines are elitist, indeed, and they are them who have grown up in well off households, a noble people who are the Lords, and them who have not grown up with money in their upbringing, they are the Jews of society. Now then though there is Jewish communism and there is Jewish communist terrorism, though they still support capitalism, yet David, the combat soldiers of the military, he is still king regarding the philistines, though the other Jews are not, for David is chosen to be king, and he has aided Dagon in the past when the philistines had gone to wickedness, for David has been as an angel to Dagon, to aid him.




Now there is what is called an misanthropy pervert, for pedophilia is the bride of misanthropy, and so the perversity is with them in society.




Now let Samson not blind himself by his own choice, and let him not attack the philistines when they are at peace, for Beelzebub has his own Samson, the misanthropy Samson, and it too is part of Beelzebub.




Now then the cheap burger has offered itself with a small bandage, but there is instead the person offering full medical for the nation, and five course meals and gourmet burgers as standard, and indeed a higher quality of living, for without raising the price of the money, the people may live as rich people, if cooperation is given, and so then will the burger and bandage rebel against the better thing offered? Will it tell the people to instead take the burger that feeds torture, discord, war, abuse, and racism, that indeed feeds these things, though railing against them as the cause, feeding things that would have starved and grown weak to death without being fed by the burger, distracting people by the bandage, or will the burger instead yield to the coming of the better things?




Now then a woman who is a judge, she is placed there, not wrongly, for there were prophets who were women, and she must not listen to the wicked men who tell her not to use her own judgment, which is the Lord's judgment by her, for she must fight those men who say she is bias and must be persuaded to compromise, for she is not bias except with those wicked men who claim she is bias, who would persuad her, as if she was bias. Now she is even commanded to fight these wicked men, for she may not let herself be compromised, so that if they will not cease, they must be removed from harassing her, for God is her father, and she answers to God, and her own judgment, if it is honestly her judgment according to what she knows to be right, it will be the Lord's judgment, as it is also with a man when he is being honest with what he knows is right, for he knows when he stumbled to be bias, for lack of strength, and yet the judges are able to resist the stumbling of themselves to still give the Lord's judgment.




Now then a person asks a questions, but the way some go is not an option, now a person says something, but the way some go is not even an option for humans, for it is not on the human spectrum, the way they go, that they are known as very retarded. Now it is the second type of rhetorical, where the way a person goes is not an option for people and for the language, indeed for what a person's responsibility is when something is said, whether they can doing something or must say they are not able to do anything, for such is the yes or no that is an option.




Now for Japeth's descendants, there are them who are fair shade who were born without their pigmentation, that you know their cause.




Now for Nephtali, profane not yourselves, compromise not your integrity to break the valley seperation of the noble Nephtali and the descendants of Shem and Japeth, for it is the segregation that is your integrity and nobility, and that you are a people of integrity is the resting place of righteousness, for your reputation is snobs for integrity. Now then if there are slaves of the fair shade, compromise not your integrity to speak of it with your mouth, unless among those of Nephtali, for it is the valley segregation, and the fair shade knows of slaves who are fair shade, that they are a burden and an evil. Now so you will not fall into the valley, for quickly catch a rock, for the valley has a slope that you may not fall entirely to the bottom. Now so too, for the fair shade, be considerate of Naphtali, that you not fall into the same valley from the other side. Now as for Beelzebub, indeed he is called the burger king, and if he is bullying noble people who are Naphtali who are not dung, but noble, and if he is not respecting the society of the fair shade, and if he is soldiers of cities, indeed Beelzebub is already being attacked, for part of the burger says, we hate the soldiers of cities, and yet that part is the same as those soldiers of the cities, and most of the soldiers of cities are hopefully not Beelzebub, for it should be that none are a burger king, for there are burger kings many places and most not soldiers of cities. Now the burger king is hating and against the priests who are Aron, whether they wish to be called Aaron or Levi, or only priests of a nation. Now the burger king who would be disrespectful of Naphtali, would also be disrespectful of the priest, and yet religion and atheism is the entire planet, and the agnostic, a small speck that is filthy, for he is great with meldok.




Now the England tongue says not anything directly, and it is found much among the fair shade.




Now what hears but does not process any information, what reads but does not process any information, and what escalates again and again in bounds, when there is not logical cause to escalate, it is a mean dog that is running towards a human with the intention to attack.




Now may the agnostic, the burger king, the volcano with its princes, go back to hell, that Muslims, priests, Nephtali, Jews, indeed all people, may be in peace when that filthy mountain, that king is gone, for the king is Beelzebub, and he is kicked from his grave. Now he is even Jewish communist terrorism, that he is also against the philistines, those who grew up with money, and those philistines who are philistines who did not grow up with money but are philistines.




Now them who respect society, they are not an agnostic, but an agnostic does not respect society. Now them who are young but have God, they are a type of young of the kingdom, and it is called agnostic, but it is not.




Now aryian is not taking serious, to be respecting their own people, for an aryian is only an anti intellectual, for they are a person against intellectualism and enlightenment, and the greatness of their own people, but an Aaron priest, or a Levi priest, for perhaps some are a Levi priest, they are taking serious.




Now then when has Dagon ever said there were such thing as men who are angels of Anothoth? But the she angels are making up Anothoth, and the he angels, they are with Dagon, for there are no men who are angels of Anothoth. Now when has Dagon ever said there are men of Anothoth? But Anothoth is fine being Anothoth, for it is fine for her to be Anothoth, but it is not good that there are men of Anothoth, not angels, for such would be called an Aryain, by name, who is a neo nazi, but not a neo nazi who is an Aaron. Now then where does an Aryian come from in my land? But from what nation have they come from? Now is it not more offensive to the Aaron priests if there are false flags?




Now then there are spiritual diseases, of mala, that are contagious, such as the wicked judgment, that is not judgment, and yet when people cover their mouth before they cough or sneeze unjust things by speech, the people are able to have better peace.




Now by a way of saying, when vigilantism is not even vigilantism, then it is justice, that the serial killers not murder anymore. Now then a person has killed, and they have not murdered, and they have saved the soul of them they have killed, that they not go down to the pit, for them who kills and does not murder, they save the souls of them that they kill.




Now there are those who fight for the philistines, those who fight for romance, fighting for Emor, or New Rome, and those who are a curtain of fire around the Sabbath, to defend the Christ.




Now Jewish communist terrorism, it is a serial killer and it is the burger and the fertilizer, for it rebels without reason or cause, for it does not keep the fertilizer on the field, the schools, and with the young, where the fields are, but it is meldok, and it spreads fertilizer upon adult society, over the city streets, in the shops, in places where it does not belong. Now then fertilizer is good for the young, for rebellion is not bad for the young in the right places, in the fields, but it is not good that the fertilizer will have meldok and begin spreading itself upon the cities and towns. Now meldok has given the fertilizer legs, and yet without meldok the fertilizer has no legs. Now so if the fields are indulging in communism, rebellion, yet they are the fields. Now then the good gardeners of the fields know what is good for the fields, that they are good people, deserving of honour, so then if you go to the fields to speak to the fields, yet you must listen to the field gardeners about what is right for the fields, that you be warned. Now are the field gardeners not wise? But indeed they are wise and good people.




Now the burger offers a small bandage, very small, and offers a burger, a cheap burger, and yet the doctors of the nation have all come to the place of the tragedy to offer extensive treatment, and the burger is speaking over them, and the tiny bandage is placed as a distraction, and the doctors of the nation, who would give the extensive treatment for the assault of the nation, they are not able to offer their treatment. Now the doctors come with wisdom and reasonable words to offer extensive treatment, and the burger offers a brazen thing that does little, and a bandage that does little.




Now what is to be eaten its legacy is honoured by being eaten by the right thing, for so the sphere of light is complete.




Now America is the Lion and the Eagle.




Now none has gone to Kir, or to the soldiers of cities who are a burger, to ask their opinion of what should be concerning the diary, for Kir is the devil's man, and the burger is the devil, for they are an Island of a mountain and its hills, filthy land that is in the Ocean, and yet the Ocean must close in again that there be peace, for the volcano rains acid from the sky and all of that Island is beneath the child, for the child considered their things not worth considering, for the child is blameless of their things, for the child is more wise than them, and so then children, you are given the Island, and you are kings and queens concerning it, for they are fools and yet you children, have more wisdom than them. Now so you do not have too much mercy, they were reckless, the Island, concerning you, and concerning the peace of your planet, that you will inherit and they were too selfish to be concerned for your well being, and indeed they were very reckless and negligent concerning you, for they are baby dung, and baby dung is not better than children. Now why what mercy or consideration do they even deserve? But you have more important things to do than what they do.




Now then give the children their childhood, for they have things of great importance to do, which is their childhood, and give the teenager their time of learning, for they are still learning, and yet already they are learning to cover their mouth before they sneeze.




Now them who must be a man or woman, who must fulfill righteousness, who are held more accountable concerning righteousness, repaying good for good, paying their debts, they are disciples, even if they believe they are an agnostic, for they have not read the scripture, but they have the knowledge of the scripture from the Lord, for they are not children of the kingdom who are free, but they are accountable to greater righteousness. Now why will they say, I am an agnostic, when they have the knowledge of the scripture from God, if not from reading? But they are disciples.




Now them who believe odd things and many odd things also, who are as if a polytheist, yet they are not a polytheist because they are having a place in society where they are a praise worthy or acceptable thing, for they are not considered very anti social, as the agnostic is who is filthy land, the burger king, but the summary is, because they are as if a polytheist but they do not have meldok, honestly, which is a bully and even a serial killer if it is continued, then they are still a good thing, and just as praise worthy and deserving of honour as they would have been prior to the angel, for turn not religion to wickedness, to misanthropy, for you know what people are deserving of honour, and the great honour they deserve if they deserve it, even if you do not know what they are, for the angel cannot complete all knowledge for you, and may not have the time, and so then you are humans, at least primitive, and familiar with humans, and not natural brute beasts, who are already close to the number of the beast. But if the philistines are searching the Heavens for answers, believing in many odd things, yet they are religion, that they are not called polytheists, but they are part of religion, and so if they are an atheist type or believing also in God, and they are searching and believing in many odd things, yet so have the philistines prior, for the goyim, they have their angelic majesties, and they have always had them, and even Rome, that crucified the son of God, it defended the angelic majesties, even though it crucified the son of God, who is the Sabbath. Now then there is the outcast prince of Dagon, a musician, an artist, a wise prince, and he is as a planet, for his mother will obey God, and cast him out, for he is too big, and he has his own kingdom in the Heavens, even in the clouds, for he cannot have his Heavenly mother when he has his own kingdom, a moon that is like a planet, and so his mother obeys God, and she has cast him out, and is he not a philistine prince who believes in many odd things, things of angels, and so let him know, whatever you can take of high things, of wisdom, of the Heavens, it is yours and not anothers for it has already belonged to you.




Now in summary, what is an agnostic in the way it is intended in the diary? But it is meldok, another meldok, for those who are not with meldok are not considered an agnostic by the diaries, and not considered a polytheist. Now then if there are polytheists of the Hindus who are not with meldok, they are not being polytheists, even though they speak of what is considered to be a secular knowledge, and the Buddhists, they are having the wisdom of the world, that it came close in much, for they are the knowledge belonging to the world, and they are not considered polytheists, but indulging in wisdom as a religion, knowledge of the world that came close, and does not Buddhism also have its place in Sion and Zion? Now they cannot be polytheist because they are not meldok. Now to be considered a polytheist there must be meldok.




Now then the agnostic who is having the shapes of clouds as their idols, their gods, who is also not having God, but a false version of God, they are them who will often be a burger king, and so then if any is a burger king, they are indeed a polytheist, and they are an agnostic who is a polytheist, and they are also with meldok, and they are more important than substance, than reality, for they are by their own beliefs, not more advanced than children, for children are wiser than them, and yet they are more important than peace, and being against racism, the burger is fed to those who would be doing evil in that way, and being against torture, they feed the beasts of torture that would torture when it is wicked and wrong, and being against anything, the burger feeds what it is against, for what it is against, so the burger feeds, and such things require doctors of society, those with sound reason to offer, and much treatment is required, but indeed the burger feeds such things, and the small bandage is given to distract, and the work of the doctors is refused by such and indeed these evil things would have been starved and grown very weak and the doctors would have been able to give treatment. Now then though the agnostic polytheists are good intentioned, or so they might believe, yet they are evil, the burger kings, for they are more important than peace and morality, for in their meldok they cannot judge much right and wrong, though they believe likely that they are able to judge. Now then have not the nihilists who would cause chaos in society for a nation, said, to cause chaos and discord, that the soldiers of cities are servants? Now these are them who offend a child, a better is a sperm than those who would plant mental illness in people, as if they were a machine of wood and metal, and not people, for such is the misanthropy also, that offends the child, and better is a sperm who grows angry and calls from a distance evil things when a slave owner is not having enough romance, or quickly, than those who go about society as if people were machines of wood and metal, for it is a disgusting abomination, for if the soldiers of cities are encouraged without their knowing at an earlier time, to be more important than the great importance of their task, that they are given mental illness for the purpose of causing chaos in a nation, do they not realize the angel knows of such things, that they are ongoing and at all times, for their are foreign enemies in the land. Now if the soldiers of cities become an agnostic polytheist, a burger king, yet who has poisoned them, poisoning the righteous without their knowing it? But they are not to blame for this wicked and greivious thing, for those worse than a sperm, they encourage rebellion, and the person who would rebel, yet they were not in a place to rebel, for they were not beneath their own role, but them worse than sperm have caused them to be beneath their own role, that they would rebel without reason, without their knowing, and such is the common practise of these evil people, for be aware of those who do this, for they do it in every place, with many people, causing people to be beneath their own self, and so then it has caused people to be disabled in some way, and it is for causing chaos in society. Now then most of the burger kings are not soldiers of cities, and yet the angel realizes that not all are more important with mental illness, but they are solid, not going beneath their own role, for there is honour in the noble profession they do. Now then the soldiers of cities, they are considered soldiers, angels of Dagon, angels of Anothoth, for some of them are angels of Dagon or angels of Anothoth. Now then, the soldiers of cities will not sneeze false judgments that are not the law upon people, for they will cover their mouths before they sneeze, and so they will be men and some of them will be angels of Anothoth or Dagon.




Now the sphere of light, the sphere of life, it is that killing and not murder, is saving the soul of a person that it not go down to the pit, and yet you know if God might reject them, that they go down to the pit, and there is also the killing that is sending down to the pit, because of how wicked some have been, and it is that an animals legacy is honoured when it is eaten by the correct thing, or correct person, for such is the sphere of light, and sphere of life. Now will not the Lord sometimes open the mouth of an animal when an angel is near by? But it may sometimes happen. Now terribly upset is a cat, is it not, when it cannot bring a mouse to its kittens? Now then care for a cat? But it is terribly upset.




Now then a doctrine of Babylon is the just world hypothesis, and does not the daughter of Babylon promote this thing in many ways, being obnoxious?




Now then should any ever be reasoning by the just world hypothesis? But will you not rather appeal to things of substance? Now why will you believe any criminal is guilty only because they have been convicted? But you are knowing that there is corruption and terrorism in the world. Now all these things of terrorism are a skirmish.




Now him who refuses the simple morality, who hears the thing and does not cover their mouth to declare wicked judgments, when it is simple, are they not a man who believes women about them are cattle, young and cattle, as if foolish? But they are a very older man, and not young, for they are with much misanthropy.




Now Beelzebub is made of misanthropy, and he is profane, for he is also made of profane.




Now then by misanthropy they work themselves into a frenzy, and by misogyny and misanthropy they are very unconcerned and uncaring, for by misogyny and misanthropy they are outside the limits of humanity in their judgments, for they work themselves into a misanthropy frenzy of misogyny, and they are not the same as being angry much, but they are more than angry.




Now by the misanthropy and misogyny frenzy, they attack the Sabbath, what does not belong in war, and they attack romance, profaning the sacred curtain around the Sabbath that should not be profaned, for they cannot control themselves.




Now then it was the other people who cared about the things that the burger claimed to care about, for the burger paused to feed the evil it was against, and distracted with a small bandage, for the burger of protest distracted and fed the evil, and it normalized the evil that would have been dealt with, for the burger was an ignoslack, an useless and foolish thing that meddled, that distracted, and those the burger was against, they agreed fully with the burger, only they cared about these things that the burger's foolishness did not seem to care about. Now then lower the standard, burger? But normalize to descend society to hell, will the burger? But then cease feeding the evil with your cheap and filthy disgust, for fertilizer is on the field, and it is good, and fertilizer of such a type is not for adult society, the cities and towns, and yet the burger is not fertilizer, but it is Beelzebub, a beast of him, that feeds the evil, that normalizes abuse and evil. Now then the doctor is not called to gather attention for himself when he is not required, even, for the doctor comes to the tragedy, and so then it is not good that the people are ignoslacks, or that ignoslacks are gathering attention and distracting.




Now by a misanthropy frenzy, that they have worked themselves to, they are bringing forth also the bride of Beelzebub that is pedophilia, for they are in a frenzy of misanthropy and they escalate again on their own, and they profane the Sabbath, and they are not familiar with people, and they are misanthropy perverts. Now pedophiles are the bride of Beelzebub, and they are also misanthropy.




Now then if there is a little misogyny, it is good for many, for a little salt is good, and with it is a little misanthropy? But it is not misanthropy. Now then these are the things of the human spectrum that you not turn teachings about anything into the misanthropy version, that you not turn good things against themselves, for do not be as the wicked, who make stumbling blocks. Now do the wicked believe it is some child's game, religion, for wickedness? But make not the devil's version of a religion, for it is not religion.




Now then maintain the standard, the resting place of righteousness, the fullness of the government laws of Eretz Chadrack, and anarchy maintains the resting place of the laws when there is wickedness that the soldiers of cities are not sufficient, that the resting place place is maintained the the nation does not fall into ruin, for a foreign nation is able to ruin an enemy nation in such ways, that it brings about corruption, wickedness, that it allows nihilism at a level of the laws, that if a level of the laws is open to nihilism, even with the soldiers of cities, so then slowly the whole of the nation will collapse, for not one stone may go missing, or the enemy will break through the wall, for it will exploit the missing stone, the law not being defended, and by a missing stone eventually the whole nation will fall into ruin, for open war is upon you, Eretz Chadrack, and it is always upon you, and the people will not have need to panic, for if nihilism is allowed at levels of the law, that the less violent crimes are not prosecuted diligently, so then over time, and it will not take long, the enemy will know what laws are not defended, and it will send its people, every terrorist will be sent to those places not defended, and soon the whole nation will collapse, and the enemy will do as it pleases, attacking where it wants with ease. Now then your country is not too big to fail, especially when you are its soldiers who stand on its wall, who go out to fight the enemy, for if you are a soldier of the cities, you are a soldier, and you do not know when you fight terrorism, or fight a foreign nation that is an enemy, or when you fight crime, for the soldiers of the cities are a layer of soldiers and they must defend every stone and they must be diligent. Now then what would general do? But he would look upon a foreign nation, and consider that he would loose no soldiers if he sent his people to exploit those things that the soldiers of cities would not defend, so that the whole nation would become ruin. Now how will a nation be too big to fail? But consider that there are other nations that are having large armies, and are they also too big to fail?




Now if you do not notice when you are about to sneeze, than how ill were you, that you did not even notice? But how important were you, as burger king, that you did not even notice it was not your place? Now then consider substance, and not the superficial substance, and so then be considering society, for a burger king is also very ill and they are with meldok. Now how ill are they if they believe, being the smallest portion, that they have the support of their entire nation? But they have no support of their nation if they are being a burger king, who is not respecting society. But again, they act for themselves, and they have no support, nor do they have some special mission or purpose, to defend the people, for they defend only themselves and the people are not ignoslacks. Now then though there is democracy and its ideas, yet the people do not have democracy as their religion, but it is the polytheism of a type of agnostic, who has democracy and Kir and Kursh as their religion, who has the cheap burger as their religion, for though the people support democracy, yet democracy is the not the religion of the people, and so the burger king is with meldok. Now there was a leader called W Bush who was Kir and Kursh.




Now then add all the diary to your standard cognitive ability, for speak as a child, or speak as an adult? Now then the adult language does not use words, but there are actions as well, that you speak as an adult, for a child does not have as much vocabulary.




Now then there is the word murder for what they discuss, for though they discuss many things, debating, yet the word is murder, for they are discussing what is murder. Now so are those with meldok, that what they debate, as if acceptable, yet the word for what they debate is murder, for they did not mean many words, they meant murder, for they have meldok, and it is better to be at peace.




Now then if Beelzebub is kicked out of his grave, to murder, that everything is at peace, or only wanting peace, yet he speaks words that are meant for the human spectrum does he not, for indeed there is not actually any language for him, for words are meant for the human spectrum.




Now then have you considered, it is not a matter of justice, or vigilantism, but there is the tribe that was not human, that did not become primitive people, who were people. Now then if they are indeed with much learning and yet ignorant to an extreme, not familiar with people, yet do you not at least have some sympathy? Now then let Naphtali cast the first stone in such things, for they are the most innocent in the wrongs of ancient people, and let them also cast stones at Egyptians, who are of the lower enlightenment.




Now then let New Rome abolish the barbarians, and let Sion and Zion abolish the barbarians, those of the inhuman tribe who have emerged again.




Now speak of the mystery of God? But they say nature has selected, and yet they mention part of the mystery of God. Now then each thing's legacy is honoured when it is eaten by the correct thing, and people are sacrificing themselves to the Lord, to become part of Heaven, to be transferred to Heaven. Now it is the sphere of light, and what is with Beelzebub it must be removed from the sphere of light to go to hell. Now there is no nihilism, for if any causes another to sin, the Lord is not deceived, and there is no nihilism to the Universe, for the mystery of God does not permit it.




Now her who proposes to a man, she is the wife of him, but her who is only proposed to, by mala, how can she be trusted?




Now then to deal with a foolish proverb, it does not always take two to tango.




There is a wise proverb not mine, when the cat is away the mice will play.




Now India has built, as if Bethlehem in some places, and some of them have worn angel's clothing, and yet they have not taken the religions of the Lord, any of them, at least not all, and so they have taken religions of polytheism, and have then bowed away from what they have built and what they have worn, being those who have built things for angels, and worn angel's clothing, and yet bowed away from being obnoxious, to built these things prior to the angels, to wear these things, and yet they have not become trangression under the sun, to be following the Lord's religions prior to the angel's taking what has been built, prior to the angels being among them? Now if they built these things, wore these clothes, and followed the Lord's religions, they would be saying in transgression, we are angels, and if not angels they would have been rocks of transgression, as fiery rocks that are in the fire beneath the Earth, and yet they have bowed away twice, bowing twice and they moved away, walking backwards, and they have followed polytheism instead. Now then if they do not have meldok, how will they be considered a polytheist that is offensive? But how will they be considered a polytheist? Now if they do not have meldok the angel will consider them to be having wisdom, that is their knowledge, and they will be considered a type of atheist if they do not have meldok. Now they will be water, a drink of substance, a good drink then of some type, and it in a pool, and yet it will not be considered for the angel to drink, for it will be a pool that is not for drinking by those who are following religions of the Lord. Now then if the Lord's religions can be at peace and the people of India be at peace with the Lord's religions, indeed then what will emerge? But will not Muslims emerge from these people? Now will not a holy people also emerge who are part of Sion and Zion?

Now then it is a hard law of Earth, even of the Universe, that you will not disobey reality and what is the truth of reality because of any lies of the clouds, for the entertainments are able to be made by liars, and the clouds are able to be filled with lies, and so then what is known by humans and beasts, even by the layers of rocks of the Earth, what belongs to a person by what they are, it is not changed, and them who quote the clouds against what belongs to a person, they are being a scoundrel, for they are robbed to poverty, even to slavery by quoting the clouds in matters of reality, when there is what is not theirs, but belongs more in even in great abundance, to another. Now then hang from a noose from a bridge? But so the scoundrels have dealt as a demon, and why will any hang for it as a scoundrel, for what does not belong to them, but belongs to another? Now them who hang, by mala, are a curse.




Now for the daughter of Babylon, use not words of wisdom in vain, to be an evil activist against wisdom and understanding, for use them not as a bitter misogynist uses them, mocking these things when there is no wrongs. Now the sarcasm of it, does not make it humorous, and nor is the just world hypothesis the truth. Now then take strength in a strong city, with walls, when none support the city, for sow discord, make war with the people, when none supported Babylon? Now they are the Lord's people, and is not Esua able to be saved, to have greater wisdom? But none said they were Babylon's people, that there be any war.




Now then who would know how much a prince has endured of being raised a prince? Now who would understand that they learned and inherited easily what you learn as an adult, and they had these things as a very small child, or that they endured many more things, and it is not even right to mention all the things, for you would burn in hell fire to say, it is the same, for to say it is the same, it is as a young person who has never fought who questions a seasoned soldier who has fought countless battles, having done things that others cannot understand, for hold your tongue if you would be foolish, for why would you deserve great judgment. But the higher learning has made you as a noble scribe, as a person of the palace, and yet you will not ever be able to be growing up as a prince did, that you not become a person of the palaces and not yield to a prince, for a prince is very rare, and a nation has three or four, for not many have really endured all the things of a real prince, for Joab killed what was not a real prince, but a different type of prince, and he was an evil thing that a prince would have had his servants kill with an arrow before he reached David's camp, for though he was a prince before, yet he became a scoundrel. Now how will it be so with a real prince, who has endured the many things that others cannot understand? But indeed you should be struck even when speaking with others about there being no difference. Now even children are rebelling against a prince when the prince is a child, indeed even adults are rebelling, and it is not right to mention everything.







Now then a man of worth is saying, I am responsible for what the people of my house do in some things, whether a house by mala, or a house by mala and ria, but a scoundrel is apathetic, and they are becoming filthy land, as an agnostic.




Now can we not have nice things, because of the misanthropy version of everything?




Now then people who go to work in palaces, be honouring those things that are greater than you that dwell out in the lands, for you have not been learning to become a member of the palace only to then not be wise and be a scoundrel. But it is implied that with you learning, you will also be liking wisdom if you are to be a member of the palaces, for you did not learn knowledge to then become a fool when before you would be wiser. Now then be wise, for you are a member of the palace, for the princes are noble, those who are not a lie, so then it is implied that you learned knowledge and you will be more wise than you were, for it is good to be giving honour where it is due that people will bless you as they would bless Daniel, that by goodness you will be blessed. Now there are perhaps four princes in any nation, those who are princes, who have had to endure being a prince, that you not believe that princes are everywhere, but there are wise sons in more abundance and some more wise than others. Now then love the Lord with all your heart, and have you loyalty to God, keeping firm with wisdom, for though there are soldiers of cities who are burger kings, who are despicable, yet most of the soldiers of cities are honourable, and there are very wise among the soldiers of the cities.




Now the sorcery of meldok is nothing and rediculous, for they declare, they call, and they try to do sorcery.




Now there is the serial killer who seeks to devour God with His son or daughter who is innocent, for such is them who would attack the good without reason.




Now then to remove a word from the vocabulary of the people, it is terrorism, for by such the flood waters will flood and sink the entire ship.




Now then the Aaron priests, that can be called Aron priests, it is speaking to humans as if slaves to say, take serious things seriously, for we do not say such on the planet, but we speak of humans as if humans, and say lay to heart. Now then consider the better things? But believe the Lord will not consider if you are using phrases that are not acceptable for humans? Now then there are acceptable ways by which a thing might be spoken of.




Now then what is laying to heart, being serious? But it is the higher call of action, that priests cannot take being priests for granted, for when there is a time for taking action, and not being smart in taking action, but being stupid, simple, which is the obvious truth about what is right, then an aryian is taking for granted, believing they do not have to take action, do not have to do anything, for they will be considered a priest no matter what they do, and so they are with more misanthropy, and they are an irreverent young person, an offence to being fair shade if they are a priest, and yet the priests who take serious, they are considering the great weight of when a man must take action and when he does not have to take action. Now then the weighty things, they are understanding when action is right and when it is not, for justice is what you may do in the name of the Lord, that it is justice, for what actions are not able to be in the name of the Lord, they are not fair shade, for the people are moral. Now them who keep to morality, to right and wrong, they are considered faithful servants of the Lord, for they are as if becoming part of the Lord in that they are keeping to morality, obeying Him. Now do they not win wars? Do they not prevail? But the Lord is also the God of war.




Now I have given you the word aryian, as opposed to Aron, that you might be able to easily understand, for it is of the image of a thing that was an enemy in war.




Now when society is permitting the Aron priests to be priests openly and without being pursued by the soldiers of cities, then these things will be some of the guiding principles, that the people will also know of that there might be no discord.




Now then will not Naphtali always cast the first stone with regards to the justice of the Aron priests? But the violence of the priests, it only deals with what is the devil's people, that Naphtali always cast the first stone if there is ever justice by the priests.




Now for matter of suing, an adult will be human, for they should not buy what they cannot afford, for if they have committed wickedness, they are them who bought what they cannot afford.




Now a judge angry with a prince, because they are a prince, they deserve to be slayn.




The faith of the clouds is a type of Jews, judgmental, and yet usually all that is wrong and that people do not want to be, for it stays away from the truth, as to not offend, and teaches the people wrong judgment when they are young. Now them deceived by the clouds in such a way, how will they know right and wrong concerning the Sabbath, and concerning the day of romance? But natural brute beasts to be, is the teaching of the clouds, and none is not held accountable because of the false morality of the clouds.




Now then what will be written of misanthropy? But it has no place on Earth. Now a natural brute beast, they are with much misanthropy.




Now then because very much beauty is better than much wealth, but the Lord has made it so, for a king must yield to a pretty man in all his great wealth, and so then the philistines, too, are elite and misanthropy is Esua and Edom.




Now then Judas Iscariot, for Judas does not mean the same, is a spirit that is with people, the most wicked, it would seem, for he betrays the Earth entire, and Beelzebub is a spirit, and the other Beelzebub, the priest of false goodness and purity in Babylon.




Now them who would insult the innocent, they have a problem with God, for they rebel against God, and their fight is against Him.




Now then a prostitute of the devil, who does what people are not capable of, to attempt diligently and with great effort to get people to fall in love with them so that they can betray them in a planned fashion, they are them who molest as a pedophile, for they are the work of a foreign enemy who disables, and it is equal to being molested by a pedophile, that it is a thing of war. Now so is it not the work of communists who molest a child because his parents are wealthy, to disable them, for they are angry, and they molest an older because their parents are wealthy, to disable them. Now these things are not people as being part of society, neither the pedophile or the prostitute of the devil, for these things people are not even capable of, for it is a fiction that these things actually take place, and that people are capable of these things. Now then believe not the foolishness of the clouds that come from the insecurity of men who imagine what is not of people, for their insecurity has not understood, and indeed the clouds are foolishness most of the time. Now a prostitute of the devil has attacked the child of wealthy parents with swords, and because they are a jealous jack ass who hates the noble, and a pedophile has molested because they are low and rebel against the noble.




Now then the Jews seem not to acknowledge, some of them, anything above the ice, for what is above the ice is not recognized by them, for they have reached their limit. Now then if they reach their limit concerning what is above the ice, whether a soldier of cities or not, they must refrain from opinion and hand it over to those who are able to do good for those above the ice.




Now wickedness is choosing rather the cognitive impairment to sentience in truth, for has not the Lord demanded, you will be sentient, for He has given all sentience.




Now them who will not cease rebelling against sentience, are they not terrorists? But why are terrorists being called terrorists if they are being the anarchy that is keeping the resting place of righteousness and sentience? Now believe the angel is bold in such? But the angel is even more bold than such. Now as anarchy upholds the law, the rocks, for anarchy is reasonable by definition, and it is the same as the law, for it is a mirror image of the laws, so anarchy upholds sentience, that it is a mirror image of sentience. Now then nihilistic anarchy, another thing, it is the cognitive impairment, and a great cognitive impairment of both.







Now what is misanthropy? But it is what is not sentient, what is not true, for people are truth, as much as they are with sentience, for sentience is truth, and where they are wicked, there they are practising a cognitive impairment. Now then if any is the truth, they are in total obedience, and they are totally sentient. Now the Lord is pure light, and if any is the truth, they too are the Lord, and the Christ did such, that He was in total obedience.




Now an advanced people are knowing, a third are done injustice and two thirds are dung. Now it is a general principle. Now then if a third of the Incel is not Beelzebub, but if a third are done injustice, the angel is not able yet to destroy and utterly ruin the Incel until what is good has removed itself from the Incel, for the city is called Incel, even Beelzebub's town, and yet if there are those who are only there because they have been done injustice, and are done injustice often, they are considered the righteous that the good have failed because of lack of wisdom and obedience, for the good did not fulfill all sentience and understanding, and so the angel cannot destroy Beelzebub's town if he does not first deal with the injustice that has been done to those who are there because of injustice, for if he is judging fairly, first he must deal with the injustice that has been done to them, and then he may deal with the injustice done to others, for if the injustice was done first to some, they will have to be given understanding first, and they must be saved, for the good failed them, and failed to defend them, that the angel must first be concerned for the injustice done to them. Now then when the higher enlightenment is achieved for society, when the rightful resting place of righteousness is again given peace where the higher enlightenment already is, then Beelzebub's towns will be able to be ruined and eliminated. Now the towns that must be ruined are communism of rebellion and ideology, not money, for it hates what is above the ice, and nobility, and it will be Sodom, and Incel is the other town, and it will be Gomorrah, and both of these towns are horribly wicked, towns of the devil, and sycophants in their rebellion are the communists by ideology, for they are sycophant concerning noble people, and perverts, pedophiles, are the Incel, for the bride of misanthropy is paedophilia. Now then does not Kir, from the Triassic, not familiar with humans, is he not supportive of these towns?




Now then the rebellion of communism, it is for a little on the fields, and it must remain upon the fields, for on the fields, in the right places, in measure, it is not Sodom, but only what is good. Now in great measure a thing is poison, and in a small measure, health.




Now then it is known that something cannot come from nothing, and the atheists do not believe in a creator, or at least not that they would know of, and yet do they not think of it the wrong way? Now then the mystery of God is part of the Universe, for to say, the Universe, is to say God, for the Lord is those mysterious laws not seen and not known of yet by the mathematicians, and it is part of God, is it not? Now then, if they will go further, God is a sentient being, and He is able to do as He pleases, and He cannot sin, for sin is what is against the Lord.




Now then when a thing is fulfilled, it is defeated, for the Lord wins, and the thing is buried under the layers of rock, and when it has been fulfilled, is there not the coming of a thing, for when the Hebrew Jews had fulfilled, then came the Christ, who was the totality of the fulfillment. Now then the prehistoric was fulfilled, and the Lord won, and what He selected for extinction, it became extinct, and it was buried under the rock layer. Now then surely it must be understood by the prophets that the Lord will win, and His will and ways will be fulfilled before the return of the Christ, and indeed all will be defeated, as every wrong is defeated, for wrong is being defeated, and the Lord wins, and so then all that does not belong with God, will it not surely then be removed from what is good and be cast into hell? Now all that belongs with God, will it not surely be saved, transferred to Heaven? Now then is not the mystery of God fulfilling and defeating, doing His will? But it is the Lord, and the good are to be joined with Him, for they obeyed, and those who fought for the devil, to be joined with the devil in hell, for those who have fought with the devil, is it not them who will join the devil in hell and yet those who fought with the Lord, to obey, will they not be transferred to Heaven?




A narcissist with projection is very confident in their conviction, for so their potential is as their mouth accuses.




Now a narcissist belittles what is too great for them, for they cannot comprehend, and their own substance is large in their eyes and not comprehended. Now the categories of the psychologist are a paradigm, and a small paradigm, and yet a stone house is comparable to a city. Now why will they be elevated, so that they can be with meldok? But the Earth reaches its limit, the surface of the Earth, and so it remains, that it not be a disaster happening from evil and reckless foolishness, for who endangers the world and children's children because of the great impulse of their heart to cause disaster with blindness? But what is a working model of all? Now then there is wrong if it does not take shape, for the sphere of light is contradicting itself, and yet the Earth has its place, as the ground that is beneath the people that they stand on, and it is good that the Earth be firm for them, for do not all people stand on the ground? Now then it is with prudence that such is addressed, for there are actors who wish to abolish peace, and whether because of their guilt, that the light shines upon them, for because of some impulse of the heart, or some strategy of bad sight, yet it must be addressed in prudence, not blaming the majority of the psychologists, indeed almost all, for do they not know that the Earth is not noble palaces of learning, that the Earth is not ceremonies of nobility and celebration of excellence? But the Earth is war, indeed the debaters who would disparage a philosopher, for such a story you already have, that the psychologists not believe they are disliked, and yet some psychologists are foreign enemies.




Anchoring many wicked things to a righteous thing, and the righteous thing, weighing more, will pull all the wicked things along with it, for a righteous thing drags wicked things to be more acceptable.




Now the prostitute of the devil, a communist in ideology, below the ice, do they not believe they defend a village? Now what civil war is there? But only the communist is capable. Now then let her judgment be fair, and she will use just violence, more brave, if there is some matter where she believes others must be defended.




Now there is not war between philistines and Jews, and if the Jews fight, they fight with violence and not with wickedness, for they also have the law of Moses, that they fight in brave ways. Now as for the philistines being young with less money, in a house with less money, are they not philistines? But there is no difference. Now as for Jews raised with money, are they not Jews?




Now for the prince, beware that some do not want to be there, for they are tougher than might be believed, and they are not wanting to be where they are. Now do they not say, if you cannot get what you want, it is because of me? Now so then what might not be offensive might be offensive.




Now every man has credit and some have the money to be a scoundrel a little, for it is of riches that are spiritual.




Now then better is money of mala than filthy money, bird dung, of Ria, and by money a person is able. Now not all have the money to be an angel of Dagon, for some have gone to worse than Esua, to be in poverty, to be in service of the devil, for they are beyond poor, and the Lord, the mystery of God, He judges justly, not by nihilism, and He controls the money of people, for He judges fairly, he robs the robber, he repays the obedient, He makes rich, He judges justly. Now then will the Lord say no to any who desires a good thing? But the Lord is not like the evil of the world. Now then should Esua not be removed that the Lord have full control, that things become fair? But then a communist of money, what the angel calls a socialist and not a communist, are they not believing the scoundrels will never do the right thing, for there will never be capitalism as intended, but it will always be capitalism in theory and in reality, injustice of envy and wickedness, and of Esua, and the capitalist has believed, there is still hope, and indeed it can work rightly, and yet the angel is not capitalism or socialism, but he is against the scoundrel, and against the lie, who does not really believe, and he is for fairness, for the Lord is fair, and he is against all the false religion that has come because of the puritanicalists, and he is for the greater enlightenment, and the resting place of righteousness where there can be peace, and it is not capitalism or socialism, but it calls for the Earth not be disabled by the broken leg, that is Beelzebub, that is the burger kings and the burger and bandage that distracts. Now the angel is also for the Sabbath, the day of rest, and the rest. Now do they not read fiction? For is it not also good? Now then some are liking the afternoon, others the morning and evening, and the morning and evening are one, and so it is not even the angel's business.




Now then socialism without the Sabbath, it is not good, and capitalism without the head on the phallus, which is to be a scoundrel, when the head is not on the phallus, it is not good. Now the honourable, those with integrity, those with integrity towards other men, who are men, they are having the head on the phallus.




Now the prettiest man is called a virgin, and yet if he profanes, he is not called a virgin, for if he profanes with adultery, that he becomes another thing, he is called bad, and he is not as pretty. Now has not a horse of mala called the angel a virgin, for the horse was not a scoundrel. Now think not there was some evil in such, for there are religious people already in the world.




Now then a wise woman is for mantaining her beauty, to be an eternal virgin, for it is a thing of mala, that she not commit iniquity or adultery, to thus not be as pretty anymore, for the most beautiful is called a virgin. Now believe it means anything of laying with her husband? But it has nothing to do with such. Now she may be virgin princess queen, and it is a very good thing.




Now if the boulders are causing abuse, is there not much iniquity with the boulders?




Now then there is the woman who is meant to be overweight and yet she is beautiful and there are many Jacobs who are with the beautiful, for they are beautiful. Now then consider Lucifer, giving the wisdom of beauty, that them not a wrong jackass of a wrong type, they are beautiful immediately. Now them honouring all things deserving of honour, they are not a scoundrel, and so then consider that a mans primary household comes first and he must know the house that them not married whether by Mala or by Mala and ceremony, but people witness regardless that it is ceremony, they who are not married are able to serve God more, for a man must place his primary house first for what is right. Now so consider the priorities that God gives a man, that the first tithe shall go to what comes first and his primary house should come first. Now what is the day of Romance? But it cannot be a day, only it is a portion, is it not? And yet the Sabbath is a day and it is also the morning and more things. Now work is better than misanthropy as health is better than sickness, even more, and yet there are them who fulfill other work. Now it is understood that religion is also better than the priests of wellness and it hates many of the same things as the priests of wellness call sickness and psychology is as the Earth that has stayed firm for the religious, giving all support as a loyal alliance and having caved in under the army of the devil and caused all manner of trouble for the armies of devil. Now what is considered is true religion and not any corruption of it that the people have been taught, mostly because of misanthropy that has been the hewing away by puritanicalism, for it has sought to hew away and yet the Lord demands that people not be a scoundrel. Now the angel has considered if any has chosen celibacy to be a unich of the Christs, yet the misanthropy version of anything is the devil.




Now every dinosaur a carnivore is a sicophant and every herbivore not selected for extinction, for a physician must be a dinosaur, for what they must do is not human and yet they are a herbivore. Now the carnivores, the chiefs of each period, they are them who stand with the devil as his chiefs, and Judas Iscariot is a spirit from the Jurassic, perhaps the most wicked of the devil who betrays the whole Earth. Nor Kir is the chief carnivore of the Triassic and he will maul the victim as a natural brute beast, for he is not animal or human and what empathy can comprehend him? Now still the angel is for Bethlehem and the saving of carnivores to be the Lords and the soldiers of cities, they are a new dragon of new times.




Now the clouds have been full of self transference and the foolish insecurities of them with lesser understanding and is it not even causing illness in men? Now then consider keeping the Sabbath, that the illness might disappear? But the clouds jest at insecurities of people that are assumed to be wrong and yet the young do not always know some things are assumed to be wrong and contradictions when people have insecurities, and so has it not badly effected some when they are young? Now the clouds not wanting to be snobs are doing so more that they mock at insecurities assumed to be foolish and the pretty garden slave, she is only upset she has had to work in the field at some time. Now then consider not the clouds even a little for each nation has its national lynch mob and they claim no affiliation with any gang and they have no power and yet they are lynching at times, for the wicked who follow their heart, they are not even being called wicked because of the confusion of what is soil and what is wicked, and if the wicked are strong and judging they are not called wicked, though they are following their hearts without prudence, quick to act and not needing a reason, really, by which they would jeopardize the world, doing the will of the devil, judging wickedly with what is not judgment. Now these are criminals of heart and iniquitous, strong for the will of the devil, being also the lie and allied with the lie that is not noble.


Now what is even considered? But if the nation lynch mob of a nation is as a criminal gang, and yet made of different factions, and it is not righteous, and it is not in keeping the democracy or the righteousness of the land, is it not even better that a large gang that is more honouring integrity than the nation lynch mob, was in power, for when the nation is having the nation lynch mob not following the righteousness of the land and the principles set in place, then is not the thing weighed, what gang is worse? Now then if the national lynch mob is zealous, and righteous by breaking away from the nation, righteous by breaking honour to all in society that is deserving of honour, that they become righteous by breaking away from the nation, not having to give honour, so they are a scoundrel of insolence and isolation, having the anger and rage of a field slave, for the pretty garden slave, she has not broken with the nation to be a scoundrel, but a field slave is only a little less dangerous and with rage than a quarry slave, and yet a field slave is not nearly as dangerous, it might often be considered, and yet a field slave may be dangerous, also, and death is a cloud about them, as bitter poison. Now then them who steal, robbery is able to lead a period of slavery, for will not the Lord judge, and if they cannot repay seven times, will a thief not become a slave for a time? Now yet there are them called thieves and yet they are not thieves, and they are not scoundrels, and how is it they are not slaves, only they are not thieves because they are even less a scoundrel than the gang that has become the government, and has the Lord not judged the thing, that they are less scoundrels than the wicked gang, the lie, that is the government? Now them not scoundrels, they are giving honour where honour is due, even them who are soldiers are spreading their armies, giving honour to those who are of an enemy nation who are citizens, who are at peace, who are deserving of honour, for an honourable is not a scoundrel. Now concerning those deserving of honour, them who are wicked, are they not them who are great thieves, for their robbery if even greater, for they owed honour, and are they not the slaves who are field slaves? Now then fail not to save a pretty garden slave, if she is not really having the cruelty of a field slave, for though she might make herself obnoxious at times, yet is she not still able, in some cases, to be going with the house, to even be made well that she is a woman who is not a garden slave? Now then be not deceived by the clouds, the people who pretend to be a garden slave, for you cannot learn anything that can be trust from clouds.


Now the evil, invisible stones and slab walls of Esua keep separating men and women who would be in love if not for the slab walls that are evil and glow with an evil light of misanthropy, for the light of the devil is around them, the light of the lake of fire. Now the stone blocks of Esua, with great vengeance the angel wants for them to be destroyed to ashes, to nothing, for slave owners shall not be made to go astray and should not, but that wicked fools blocks of stone and his foolish and despicable complexes that cannot force slave owners, Jacobs, astray. Now these stones are as Beelzebub himself and the stones, too, are scoundrels. Now then if the Jacobs are being pushed in directions they should not go, yet Jacob is the slave owner and Esua the servant.


Now then a virgin is young, for whether a virgin or not, it is meant a virgin by mala, who has not committed adultery, in truth, who has not committed iniquity, who has not, in summary, made themselves to be ugly, for the virgin is what is beautiful. Now then if people are keeping clean to be a virgin all their life, they are them who have not really committed adultery, in truth, for marriage is not ceremony, either, and they have not committed iniquity that would make them to be ugly, for they are remaining beautiful. Now is the Lord not able to heal the sycophantic things committed by others against a person who is a virgin? But is not Sodom with sycophantic rage against the virgin? Now is not Gomorrah for attacking people, hating humanity? Now these two beasts, these two towns, are both the devil and Beelzebub.


Now then, is it not, in summary, be not a scoundrel, and keep the elderly of the Sabbath? Now of the elderly of misanthropy, what can be said of them?


Now the people of misanthropy, they come and clean of all of the Lord's good, all good of the Lord, and they are not clean, for they are a chemical that does not belong on Earth.


Now does not the Lord offer a summary of the angel, Lucifer? For is not the Lord more intelligent?


Now be not bound by a thing that accuses of sin where there is no sin, and be not bound by a thing that accuses of blameless where there is wrong.


Now there are the things of the child, the things of the youth, and the things of the adult, and true love is the wife of a mans youth. Now the age of a man is 120 years. Now will he not retire into the Sabbath? Now the Sabbath of misanthropy casts away all things in all directions, and unjustly, and it is Beelzebubs day and day of poverty and yet the Sabbath that is the Christ preserves the things of the young and sound knowledge is found upon their lips who are elderly. Now for the elderly, is the angel not considering that the Christs Sabbath might be preferable? Now then it is the true Sabbath.


Now for apostles, a thing is happening for the Sufi within, happening for another on land and is the scripture true also for the Sufi Christian as it is true for them who are performing on land? But the Christ performed on land and the sufis also have their portion.


Now then consider what a person is as a child, and is it not the things of the adult? Now then if you call any a child, what would you be if you were a child? But the things of the child are with the adult and so if all are children, then what is the person? But the fault is not found with children. Now then do you not remember justice and morality? Do you not remember integrity? Now the fault is not with children. Now so be not smart to be old, for be not old, to be carrying out misanthropy, the wicked acts of the devil, for be not profane. Now yet if any is made astray, better is a sperm than them who do such.


Now then the burger must perish, for they defend their nation, lords of many men, and yet they are lords of none and they only defend themselves, for their own group they defend, and their group in mala, and the people are liking God. Now with the giving of themselves permission, they defend their own group, the volcano that is Beelzebub and his princes, and without consideration they take a stance of war when they should be offering aid. Now then they do not consider, and they take stance of war where they should offer aid, and so they make themselves traitors and their hearts, have they not said, we are the defenders of the flock? Yet they are only defending themselves, and they take a stance of war. Now then they are only good for being soldiers in that case, and they have no ambassadors to send if it is so, for they send soldiers without ambassadors, and without leaders, as if a separate nation, and it is their own people they might take a stance of war regarding, and there is no war. Now blind then and dogmatic, and yet it is not an option in such cases to even be dogmatic for a thing, for it is their own people. Now then they might consider, they take a position for neutrality, and yet if they are not neutral considering their own people, are they not confused about what the neutrality was for? Now then it is madness, and it is the volcano of Beelzebub, for they have not mastered the things of children, and indeed they have taken the wrong road to being a man, and not become men, for they have been imposters not men, not having to learn the things of being man, but finding an insane way to be a man, having great foolishness that they need not be loyal to their nation, and they need not protect what is good for their nation, for the burger king has isolated himself in that he does not have to have integrity, for he has become a man without performing what is right, without giving honour to what deserves honour. Now then is he is a prince then, alienated from the people? But he makes himself a filthy prince of Beelzebub, for he is not really a prince. Now so he will hate the prince.


Now if they cannot perform what is right to those they do not even know, are they not a prince of Beelzebub? Now it is so when the person is deserving of what is right. 


Now then how much of psychology is counter intelligence, as it is called by people, and how much is the truth? But what paradigm is sound, with the things of the truth? Now then do you not remain with the judgment of the Lord, that such judgment is the truth? Now then has not the judgment of the Lord been that the pedophiles are much the problem with the nation, even with the world? Now is it not the reason for much evil? But then consider whether a person is a pedophile, or whether they are jealous, or whether they are greedy, and consider the things of the judgment of God. Now such is the sound paradigm of truth that is found when the full circle is made to return to the truth.


Now then there is much counter intelligence, and it is called psychology often, and much of what is called psychology that even comes from them who are psychologists, it is counter intelligence, for consider the truth when it has come to the full circle back to the truth, that there is the motives of abject behaviour, which is guilty of a crime, jealousy, and greed. Now then it is often pedophile, jealousy, or greed. Now then all those who are misanthropy people are pedophiles and yet a pedophile, even if being homosexual, is not a homosexual, for a homosexual is not attracted to children, but not all those who are with the same gender are homosexual, for are not many of the pedophiles with the same gender, and yet they are not homosexuals, for they are different, and it is different, and the sycophant who is with the same gender, they are not a homosexual, for a homosexual is not attracted to children. Now then if there is them who are believed to be homosexual and yet they are attracted to children, they are not a homosexual, but they are something else. Now then only them who are child molesters are pedophiles. Now them who are misanthropy people, they are pedophiles, and the there are sycophants who are also pedophiles, for the two types of pedophiles are Sodom, violent sycophants, and Gomorrah, misanthropy, and neither Sodom and Gomorrah is homosexual, but they are the two cities of sexual offenders. Now then what offence is there from the fornicator who is a homosexual? But if Christians cannot greet them on the street, yet still they are the cup of water, or some drink of an advanced society, and homosexuals are not Sodom or Gomorrah, for Sodom and Gomorrah has the two types of pedophiles, and if they are believed to be homosexual, yet it is different, that they are not to be called homosexuals.


Now if any woman is misanthropy, yet she is not a person, and if any man is misanthropy, yet he is not a person, and everything below Ur, and below the Earth is very wicked and cannot be trusted, for brutal is everything that is below Ur and below the Earth.



Now for judgment, for them who weigh and judge, being men, if any is still your brother, then they are not guilty to be killed, and if any is wicked that they are not your brother, then it might then be justice that they are killed, for you may not stand against the blood of your brother. Now the very wicked are not your people, not a bastard, not anything but a wicked person, and men cannot torture much without being guilty, because they are not angels, for those who would torture much, they blaspheme, because they are not angels and they stand as if they would be angels, and yet they will not become angels this way, but they will become Kir, who is also a Sodomite, and nothing is keeping them from becoming Kir, which is in the realm of the lake of fire, for humans may not torture beyond a limit, and they may not torture much, for if they stand in a place not theirs any longer because they have exceeded the limit, they will not become an angel, but they will become going into the lake of fire to become Kir. Now even the Christ said, let him without sin cast the first stone, for the Christ fulfilled a man, truly human, and He mentioned an angel, for He came as a human, truly human, to fulfill the things of a human, and it was even a suicide mission. Now then if any partners with the angels, to be on the side of the angels, a vigilante, they will know what is right and what is not, and where they must relent, for there is the vigilante who has been on the side of the angels, and will not some of them even be angels of Dagon if they wish? Now them who refuse to fight when it is their duty, not showing up to battle, or showing up and then not fighting, they are not deserving to die in battle, but they are deserving to die by a vigilante that they are not entitled to die in battle, and so Joab killed a traitor and made an example of him, for the captain of the host of David was Joab, the vigilante, and a vigilante is even knowing when he must do what is called only his job, that he does not have a choice, for he is not a child of the kingdom, but he is a man. Now every pedophile must be killed, if they are of age to be so, and if they are really a pedophile, for every Sodom or Gomorrah must be killed.


Now there is the special religion, the special religion from God, for the pretty man, or pretty boy, that they follow a special religion from God, that is mostly the same, but is also much different in some things, for there is what is even called pretty boy's prerogative, for they deal with much different things, and they are given a special religion from God to follow, for people know what a pretty boy is not the same as a man, that they remember it. Now what can a pretty boy say that is not appropriate? But a pretty boy is saying what a man cannot say, and how may a pretty boy be called a pedophile for what is not a pedophile if a pretty boy says it? But be considering pretty boy's prerogative, for a pretty boy is not a man, but he is a separate thing among you, meant to follow a different way and religion that is mostly the same but is also different. Now does not Sodom and Gomorrah hate the pretty boy? But they are very offended by him, for the pedophile hates the pretty boy, and so, too, the rapist hates the pretty boy.


Now there is much hatred and wicked indignation from the rapist or the pedophile concerning a pretty boy, and misogyny is not a possibility for it.


Now then cast away all counter intelligence, psychology not right, when there are matters of judgment, for remain then with the Lord's judgment, the truth, which is the circle returned to the truth, for there is a pedophile, the rapist, and both are offended by the pretty boy, and anger is with them because of him. Now Sodom and Gomorrah hates the pretty boy and it hates the angels, does it not? Now women of Sodom or Gomorrah are not women, or people, and Sodom and Gomorrah does not have people. Now then Kir is even a Sodomite, and much so, and he will support Gomorrah.


Now then the Universe is God's, for confess that God's judgments are true, for all know right and wrong, for confess the fullness of the truth, regarding all truth, which is the Lord's judgments. Now then if they do not like the truth, being afraid of the light, that they begin to cover themselves over with the rocks and the Earth, making wrong psychology, even the psychologists doing so, indeed do not go with them, do not regard them, for you may not go with them.


Now be not a theif who become a slave, for they are not really Damascus, and how long they will be a slave is not known.


Now then be not a nihilist atheist concerning what is above the Earth, for if any is responsible, they must pay seven times.


Now then be not a scoundrel, be not a lie, for does not a lie also have such that they do not do and they do not like that others will do.


Now what is applying for a thing, it does not apply for another thing? Now indeed it does not. Now then the fourth day is a curtain of fire around the Sabbath, for the fourth day is also not for war and not a thing for war.


Now cast yourself not into a pillar of fire, for as far as you would perish, then you will perish, and as far as you would be good, will you not be given good, and what you give tithe to, you get from, for you get from what you tithe to.


Now then are not even some of them robbed horribly by the Lord because of their wickedness able to gain life by tithing to Dagon? But is it not so that for some they are not able to gain anything? Now then the Lord is Him who conducts all, the giving and weather, and yet the devil does war upon the Earth, and the royal priesthood, the Christians, they are able to prey to God, and for the whole Earth. Now where many are gathered, will not a few of them gather and prey that the whole Earth, the people of the Lord, might receive the benefit of the royal priesthood?


Now them who speaks against the angel, do they not speak against their children, and what they would do, but it is happening later that they do not understand, are they not considering then to do so to their children? Now then do they not believe in God? But is there not a recompense, and what can a man offer of value? Now then let the sky, the night sky, not be cursed by them. Now then Dagon will not trouble them who are humans if they are not able to be at peace, for he will give wisdom and no man will be his friend if they cannot be at peace, and yet if there is any able to be at peace, their names will be listed that they aided the angel during his time on Earth.


Now then what false thing a person says, as if devil witchcraft, not being true what they would speak, what they say is true of themselves, for they speak what is false, and yet it is true of them, even also by their mouth.


Now you will not make prisons for the not guilty, for you will not build up government or official structures to be official things dictating, with a false authority, what is above the land. But psychology is the Earth, and it is what people stand on and walk on, and the atheists are of the Earth, and the walls of them are only going so far, keeping to the right places, and so it is then that there shall be no prisons built for the sky, for prisons are not for free, and the not guilty are to be free, for you will not regard any official or government thing that would dictate, as if with authority, what is above the Earth, what is for religion, for they will offer it all up, all of it, to the public realm, the free realm, for they will not say there is any proof, for they are in the realm of religion, and so neither a church nor a government, nor a government thing, nor a thing of science will built a prison for a free people, for there will be no word heretic, whether a heretic according to church, or a heretic according to state, for what is in the realm of religion is for a free people that they will not regard a prison built by a church and they will not regard a prison built by a government, for they are not permitted to regard such things, for they speak wickedness, they speak brutality, they speak great wicked offence to cite any prison for a free people, to cite any church or state or thing of science, for psychology is able to be cited, as if a prison, because it is the Earth, and yet what is above the Earth, what is above the ice, it is free. Now then no psychologist would have any knowledge, indeed none, about anything that is above the ice or above land, and if they are to indulge in what is above land or above ice, they must offer it all to the air, to the free people, to the public, for it may not be called science, for it may not be placed in prison. Now then let them show their learning, their intelligence, their maturity, for more is demanded of them, for they should not be chauvinists, as blind shepherds, regarding the environment anymore, for they will respect the environment that they are being worthy of honour.


Now then negative understanding, when there is no understanding with a person, and the understanding has become more in the negative, to be understanding everything wrong, it is a person covered in confusion, a person who cannot be spoken to, for they are a thing of confusion, covered in confusion, for a person cannot speak to what is not, and it is when a person is greatly with misanthropy that such is possible, for it is only so with a misanthropy person.



Now then they have believed some behaviour is possible for humans, and yet it would be a person not a human, but a person who is completely misanthropy, who is extremely different from a human if they were to be behaving such and saying some things when they would be saying some things. Now such people are called misanthropy people, and they are not human and they are below the Earth, that you not consider the foolishness of fools who do not understand and yet speak as if they would.


Now why does the Incel believe in the clouds? But they believe what is nature has been made by the clouds, that the clouds have caused what is only the nature portion of humans. Now then if most of the Earth became misanthropy, yet they would perish and a generation of humans would emerge, and so the misanthropy people seek what is known to be impossible.


Now the recompense is them who see a more ugly person when the person is much beautiful, they are right to be covered in leprosy, for they should be covered in leprosy.


Now then consider the height of measure, that if any is having meldok and they are having such below Ur, below the water line, that they are wicked misanthropy below the water line, which is murder, or attempt to murder, yet if they are so they are understood to be a pedophile. Now even a slave not a pedophile will not be so extreme in their brutality, for the measure of them is at the bottom of the Ocean, the pedophile, and their misanthropy is such that another would be murdered if they were to comply, and the pedophile knows not how extreme they are.


Now then a person is killed by the elephant proverb, for it is another's proverb, that some have touched the ears and some have touched the legs, and some the side of the elephant, and so when a person deserves to die, it is for many reasons that they deserve to die, and so for what reason would they prefer to die? But a pedophile has been traitor to the king and his son, so much so that he deserves to die in his wickedness that is much, and a pedophile has been very wicked against righteousness to be as a serial killer towards concerning the righteous, and yet if he is killed, it is easier to only mention the legs, that they are a pedophile, for they are known to be a pedophile by the ears, by the side, by many things things, and yet the legs or only mentioned and it is well, for men must have the legs if they are to do anything in my nation.


Now then what is a pedophile is a pedophile for all people, for the counter intelligence is not even an option, and Sodom may not lift up its voice, for it has no right to lift up its voice, for truth is truth and knowledge is knowledge, and ignorance is not what any people are entitled to in anything.


Now what is not an option for a thing, with regards to evil, a pedophile or rapist might speak it, a pedophile or rapist might act it.


Now Eretz Chadrack is not the refuge of Sodom or Gomorrah, for there is the Universal nature of humans, that Sodom or Gomorrah, sycophants and misanthropy, they are not with Damascus, for there is the Universal things of the nature of humans. Now then is it not understood that many pedophiles or rapists have been insolent?


Discord is easy for some to name, but the enemy still continues with it, for it is easy to call out, and yet the enemy is for war.


Now the angel has not considered whether he sows discord against himself, for it is not a consideration, and there are them for whom it is not even right to appease and please.


Now then is it not wise to consider not sowing discord against yourself in many things? But there is that for which it is not a consideration.


Now women shall not have the slaying of those not guilty, to be infected with a disease of dung. For yet if a man should perform more, yet if another man is not guilty of anything they are not guilty of anything, that her mouth will have guilt for her.


Now to the adulterous woman, really an adulterer without reason, without real excuse that might lessen the guilt, and it being true that there is not really excuse that might lessen guilt by the guilt of the man who is not really her husband but has married her, then to such an adulterer, the angel has not stolen your beauty.


Now then they should not give their children names from the Old Testament, for each of these names is a thing of mala, that none should be given these names, and yet because it was not known, then will they not let it be at peace for a time, because the people did not know and it was good to them? Now then because of boulders, people with the names from the Old Testament, it is good that the priests are deciding if for a time they will not be called Aron, or they may even choose the name Levi until the names from the Old Testament are no longer used, for them who have such names are boulders later, when it is accepted that such names should not be given anymore, and those who wear religious clothing they have not fulfilled, they too are boulders rolling about in the street. Now in India, they have committed much folly, to wear religious clothing they have not fulfilled, and they wear angel's clothing even, and it is as boulders heaped up about buildings built for angelic majesties, and yet what is the religion of the polytheists, but it is as a pool of water not for drinking that is peaceful, and is not offensive to hear, and yet if the polytheist is being wicked, having meldok, or being wicked in some other way that they would be misanthropy, not knowing how wicked they are being, then what defence can be given to them? For they are pools of water not for drinking, and the pools are peaceful and not offensive, and yet if the pool lashes out with misanthropy or meldok, then do they not know they are being very wicked and more so than other peoples? Now then there are then angel's clothing, and the clothing of religious kings, kings by religion, and they are thrown into the water not for drinking, that there would be a place of boulders, and such is not good. Now then for a time those with names from the Old Testament will not be boulders, for will groups not have other names until they are able to be called a thing, to be called their right name? Now then give not names from the bible, for make not boulders for the people, and it will be a thing of the future.


Now is not the beginning of the misanthropy person rebellion against God and against people, for do they not believe early that good people should be hurt, that they should be taken vengeance upon? Now then by wickedness of a natural brute beast, quickly they are become misanthropy and misogyny, taking the number of the beast even, for they are not human. Now early they are cosmic war against God, and they become misanthropy and misogyny.


Now there are them who believe the wrong metaphor for a thing that they are a foolish and wicked spectacle, and yet what excuse is there for them? Now is not blood already upon their head with lies?


Now let the truth be understood that they are rightly warned, for they will not then say they were not told the truth, for there is no victory for the women concerning the man who is not guilty, and no victory for the man concerning the woman who is not guilty, for Beelzebub, would he not have you be ignorant of such? But the poison who teaches any victory of wickedness, rejoicing in wickedness, he or she is a fool, and they are with ignorance, telling ignorance, having been much defeated. Now then woman, be not deceived, for surely there is the Lord, and the Universe is His, and wickedness or foolishness will not profit you or prevail, and man, if the Lord has robbed you because of your wickedness, what fault is it of the woman's? Now then believe not in the power of your own ignorance, for it is nothing, and would not Beelzebub want you to be believing lies?


Now the Sodomites are raping and molesting everything, the Gomorrah people are raping and molesting everything, and yet believe not in wicked nihilism, for has not the Lord created every person?


Now some things counter intelligence is are bringing about what is inflammatory, causing discord in argument and other ways, offering ignorance to distract from the truth, justifying the wicked, changing the topic, causing opportunity for argument and discord, and many other things counter intelligence is.


But them with meldok will confess they do not know a person, and them not using sentience in accusation are being guilty and showing forth guilt of a thing they accuse of.


Now then Naphtali is not the Jews of the Old Testament, but it is Naphtali, and their promised land is in the good lands.


Now then it is better if the soldiers of cities are not segregated in a way they are not having loyalty, for the people are loyal, and so it is better the soldiers of cities are of the consideration of soldiers and not soldiers of cities, that they are of the education of soldiers in many things, understanding the cold war and terrorism, that the soldiers of cities not become a hassle and burden for the people during the cold wars that are always happening. Now there is the nation's lynch mob that is made of many factions, and much of it foreign soldiers, and there is much counter intelligence. Now there is also the colonies of pedophiles that are made, for the pedophiles are liking to move their dwellings to where there are other pedophiles, and so they make their colonies in towns and in cities in places and they become entitled, believing they have thrown off the yoke of the righteous, that they need not endure any trouble. Now then people may be aware of such colonies, that they have their people in many places, always protecting other pedophiles, that they have soldiers of cities who are even with them, that the places of dispatch may be compromised by them and times of opportunity are for them when the places of dispatch are understood to be secure for them, for they are known to like to intimidate with their soldiers of cities who are theirs, and they even have their many known people in their colonies and they have taken almost whole towns and areas of cities and they are even having their gathering of intelligence, and they are having what might provide them safety, for they make themselves seem to have more numbers. Now then is not help from outside these colonies that are secret colonies not known about? But there are soldiers of cities who are even aiding those who kidnap children.


Now the pedophile has grown angry and said, for nothing, a thing not worthy mentioning, some thing of words not wrong, people are pedophiles, for they are blaspheming justice.



Now do not the pedophiles slander the young with what the pedophiles are, to endanger them, to gain some false bias for the pedophile?


Now be not concerned about the false memory, them who have false memories, for if they are having false memories that would make them as if guilty, yet they will not be as the insolent pedophile, and if they are having false memories of being a victim, yet what harm do they do? Now then being slandered is not as being guilty for they do not weigh the same, for there is weight to being guilty and people know the truth, whether a person is guilty or not.


Now if a woman is not liking to greet the homosexual, yet the homosexual is what is called a fornicator, and they are not a pedophile, for a homosexual is not attracted to children, but the pedophile is a very different thing even if they are seeming to be a homosexual and committing the same fornications. Now then if she is of the type of people that she does not like to greet the homosexual, yet she has no choice, for she is as the Christian woman, and it might be sin for her, that she has no choice. Now then be not an ignorant people, mocking and scorning each other like wicked children.


Now if a woman is laying with women while her husband is gone a long time, yet is it not much better, especially if she is honest with him ahead of time of it?


Now a strong pedophile, are they not misanthropy? 


Now then for the psychologists, for the leaders, it is good that the environment is always respected, for people are part of the environment, that the necessary intelligence is not a chauvinist and a blind Shepherd, but a person considering the environment in what they do, for some things must be surrendered to the air, other things the domain of the Earth, some things right for the speaking of nature, other things right for the speaking of people, other things right for the speaking of slaves, and so then the environment is always considered that you be an advanced people, for the signs for the coming of Dagon, have they not been fulfilled and performed on land? Now then if they are then respecting the environment of the physical, then they are respecting the environment in mala, and there is not excuse for them not to respect the environment, for they will not throw offence even in the labelling of the people when not all are the same, and they are not able, by the Lord's judgment, to contradict the Lord's judgment and call them something different. Now then they must surrender to the environment what belongs to the environment, respecting the environment, surrendering to the Lord what belongs to the Lord, that they not contradict the Lord's labelling of things, for the people are forbidden to regard such labels that contradict the Lord's judgment. Now communism with atheism, it does not respect the environment, for will an entire nation be a wall and fields only? But the angel believes in the commune, that it is good, and yet not in communism with atheism. Now then surrender to the air what is for the air, above land, and surrender to the Earth what the Earth claims rightly.


Now appeal not to the clouds in anything, for they have no power or aid, but appeal to all truth, in righteousness.


Now will Eretz Chadrack owe the Earth an apology, even the generations of their children to come? But them given a great blessing more than any in two thousand years will also be guilty by such that they were foolish and wicked.


Now if the Shogun's heart is corrupted by the wormtongue of Beelzebub, yet does the angel not have his own wormtongue? Now then for the many Shoguns of Eretz Chadrack, for there are all the soldiers of cities leader chiefs, all Shoguns, and there is the leader of the meeting place, like a Shogun, and there is the leader of Cessus, a Shogun, and there are the high generals of David, Shoguns, let none of them listen to wormtongue, for whether he comes from one group or another, yet if he is corrupting and persuading righteous judgment, yet it is not the cooperation of peace with justice and reason, but if he is corrupting with what is not the council of peace and reason that is with righteousness, then let no Shogun be corrupted by a wormtongue, for by the corruption of the Shogun so the whole of the group will be disabled and even made to be wicked, so that the wormtongue must be removed, for the wormtongue of the angel is councils of peace and reason, that it councils to trust God, for the religion is also called the genius club, for the more intelligent, the more obedient to God, for what is the difference in being very intelligent or being obedient to God? But there is no difference, for to say either is to say the same thing, for the religion is also called the genius club, that you not be deceived by disobedience, that you not be disabling yourselves with clumsy blindness. 


Now if you educate a slave, you have wasted money, and it is sorrow to waste, for you have given much knowledge to what cannot use knowledge correctly.


Now a slave will use much knowledge to be dung, for they will not use knowledge correctly.


Now what is not an option for a thing, is not an option.


Now there are concerns of what is not, and what should be ignored, and there is the opposite version of things, as if those things were the actual version of a thing.


Now there is the Incel version of feminism, as if it was feminism, and it is dung spread much, and it is even in the clouds, and yet the people of truth, they have better sky beyond the clouds, for the people who do not regard the clouds, they dwell upon the mountains above the clouds.


Now then does Eretz Chadrack honour father and mother? But the Emperor is mother, in Heaven, and God is their father. 


Now a person will say of a slave, you are not white, and a person not white will say, you are not our shade, either, for it is a slave, for there is not prejudice against others in the thing.


Now if a person is behaving much that they deserve to die, were they not already guilty of what is deserving death by the judgment of men that they then behave much that they deserve to die? Now if a person is behaving much that they deserve to live, have they not already been doing much good and having been honourable? Now if a person is afflicted with a thing, might they not echo those things in their own behaviour for a time? Now if a person is exposed to dung, might they not become ill, that they are a little abject for a time? Now them who blaspheme, not meaning to, because of difficult things that have been, when there is an evil season, they do not test the Lord their God. Now if a person is temporarily paranoid, has there not been evil? But to be ill with paranoia, it must be chronic, a permanent thing, for all the illnesses are for what is chronic. Now then do not judge the sick, if it is sickness, when it is sickness of mala, for they have been around what they could not help. But then do you not consider your neighbour anymore, as Christians, or as fellow believers, or as fellow citizens, that you might give aid, charity concerning justice, for the consideration for the well being of others? But them who are able are them who are able. Now is there not the saying among you, it is only what people do? Now then if you do not consider emergencies to be emergencies, what manner of people are you?


Now then there is them who when they are right to do a thing that is good and honourable they go the other way to the opposite of that thing, for the time comes to do a thing that is honourable and they rebel and go the opposite way, for if they should bow, they are disrespectful instead, to bow as a devil rather than to bow as an honourable person, and if they should yeild, they profane instead, to bow as a devil instead. Now then do they not trust the Lord? Or do they believe they will be called foolish, if they are behaving honorably?


Now it is even an abomination: there are them, the burger, that is ugly, that Beelzebub, who believe it is a good cause that the Earth entire, even generations to come, be disabled, that they fall from the higher enlightenment, that the Earth does not have peace from violence, that people are disabled by ignorance and more ignorance, that they are given bad understanding of things, and so then the burger is the Incel portion that is found also with the leaders who are the lie, and with that portion even of great nations that is Incel, that would carry out terrorism, disabling the planet, and with blind Shepherding, believing it must be a good thing, and yet lacking all prudence to know how it would be good, for they are greatly incompetent and endangering their nation and the whole Earth, even for the generations to come. Now then every Incel must be enslaved, for there can be no peace, for the Incel will ruin the whole Earth and disable it to ruin, for they fight with what is wickedness, and great wickedness, slaying the able and intelligence, all the great people, wishing to slay them in cowardly ways with tactics only a pedophile is capable of, for the Incel having nothing to lose, and they are all pedophiles. Now then why bother to tell them what they already know is objective and undeniable truth? But they are servants of the devil and they are slaves, for it does not matter what you would tell them, for they already know the undeniable truth, for what they do is only what they are, and you only commit what is grevious in attempting to tell them what they already know to be the truth, for the Earth will be disabled by the slaves, all the slaves, unless you enslave them, and quickly they will try to capture those not slaves, to be slaves with them, so that the whole of the right thing is thrown away, for will they not try to make those not slaves to be slaves with them, working with cowardice, that slavery is then abolished again. But slavery, when has it ever been done correctly? Now the angel says, yet there can be no reasoning with the Incel, except that portion that was people of palaces, who were actually good, for all the Incel must be killed or enslaved, and they are all pedophiles, for they only attack with cowardice mostly, and they seek to disable and to slay with cowardice, and rarely are they committing violence with battle bows. Now so, also, any who fight with the Incel are fighting for the pedophiles, and those who refuse to be loyal, they are deserving to be killed by a vigilante when it is clear they refused to fight so much that they are understood to even be a traitor who abandoned their people strategically to be attacked when the duty of the soldiers and the generals was to protect their people, to remain loyal to them, that Joab is a soldier, and the Lord has decided that he is captain of the host of the people, that he has the right to kill those soldiers with vigilantism who were traitors, who showed up very late for battle when there was no excuse, who were traitors at a time of war, that Joab is judged by the Lord to be captain of the host and David is judged to be king.


Now every pedophile is mean, for they are filled up with hate and anger, for a Gomorrah person has had anger and hate of a child and their opinion is that they wished to do much worse to them, for their anger is great, for they are slaves and the child a slave master, for it is of the cosmic war of the Gomorrah person, and the cosmic war of the Sodomite, and the Sodomite is often even more violent, wrathful devils, and both have attacked what portion of a person is the Lord, for both have attacked God, and much anger has the Gomorrah person, for they shall even weep with anger, for their anger is great, for they are a slave, and the pedophile who kills a child, doing such with meanness and cruelty, and much anger, will not his head explode, some of them, that he seems as if he is with remorse and weeping? Now for Judas Iscariot it was also so. Now there is no gentle pedophile, no gentle rapist, either, for both are cruel and extreme things on Earth.


Now then it is a thing of importance to understand, to know, that the problem of Eretz Chadrack, what caused all discord, all problem, all divide, all disarray, is the pedophile, for those who say to the citizens, they do not belong, yet is makes no sense, and is not even a possibility, and such, also, has the pedophile said in their many words, the essence of their evil, for a man knows what is righteous, and it is not that which deserves reward, or much reward, but first a person is judged, having the standard morality before they follow the Christian way of non judgement, where none should judge them, for first they are having all the standard things of morality, of a man, and what must be performed, and what does not have to be performed, and what is only standard morality, and then they may be that which none should ever be judging, when the standard things of morality are there, the easy and standard things of not a young, but of a man, that are not very much, even if they are seeming to be much a difficult at times when there are the wicked who will not accept the things of men, who are insolent against sentience, that the standard things might be bowed to by the wicked, who have fallen from the human spectrum, to be Sodom or Gomorrah. Now then the discord, the disarray, the problem, it is the pedophile, that such must always be dealt with before anything else, that it is an extreme thing of great weight. Now then Abishag is not considered to be evil and he indeed is not a lie, and he indeed does belong, and he is even a true prince of Eretz Chadrack, and the angel is another prince, and the nation has perhaps four or five true princes, as any nation would, for does God make the number a great portion? Now every person born in Eretz Chadrack, they must belong, for it cannot be otherwise, and yet the pedophile is not a bastard, but they are what does not belong on the planet, and they say to the standard morality of men, they do not belong, and it is wickedness.


	 	

	 	

Now then consider many places to be as a farm, where there is the different animals, and then consider the trooden that the farmer's daughter might not be willing to kill, and consider the soldiers who are away and fighting, and the soldiers of cities who will not allow people to kill the trooden though it goes out and mauls children, and consider the farmer's husband, who has not killed the trooden, for the farmer's daughter will not, the farmer's wife will not, and yet the farmer, the husband, is he able to kill the trooden if it has gone out before to maul children, or will the soldiers of cities, our own soldiers, not allow it, and do they say there is no evidence of the thing, although it has been well known, even to them, that it is a trooden that goes out to maul children? Now then is society not less advanced that the soldiers are much away and leave areas of their nation to defend themselves, for if they do not begin to handle such things on their own, they will all surely die. Now then how wicked are some of the soldiers of cities, who tell their own citizens, as if they were citizens of an enemy nation, that they cannot defend their own towns and own areas when there are predator dinosaurs emerging and aweful things of the devil. But does not the angel say, progress towards greater advancement than ancient people, for humans are not chauvinist, and chauvinism, does it not come because of sin, that people become cattle, men and women, and yet humans have no regard for the false stories of the chauvinists, who call themselves and others cattle, and yet humans cannot contain such lies in their heart, for they are humans, believing men and women should be together, for they say not the man, nor the woman, but they say humans, and some will not even say husband or boyfriend, but they will say us, or we, for cattle struggle with such things as children mock with, and yet the words of cattle are all disrespectful for humans, for human is the standard, that humans are not chauvinists. Now then are there not them capable of what humans would revolt against to perform, to be dung in their actions? But cattle should not have a mouth against humans, and yet society is not advanced anymore, for in many things it has fallen away from advancement because of the misunderstanding of Christianity, for the Christ did not come to abolish Moses and the advancements of society, but a person is first being moral, as to be a man, before he should not be judged anymore. But then has not the angel given a society, and yet you permit people to commit wickedness by the more cowardly means that are an abomination to humans? Why then will cattle have the same rights as humans? But will not the cattle seek to enslave themselves because of the yoke of Jacob? Now if they are worse than a chauvinist, but a chauvinist and pedophile, as pedophiles are known to be, indeed they are as slaves, also.




Now then there are the circles of a person, for you should not journey around the circle to come to a worse place, being worse than you were, for go not out from being evil to grow into what is more evil, for surely you will find society again by means of just people who are right to be what they are, and you will not be able to be what you are if you are coming full circle to be something worse, for do not become more of a scoundrel, but go with God and do not be a scoundrel, but be just, and be fulfilling the morality of a man, who repays debts, who is knowing what a man is responsible for, that you be secure in good understanding, going in the way of kindness and truth.




Now then with each generation the dinosaurs are emerging through man, and is it not because of sin? But some have what good roles they have that they become a dinosaur, and others have their wrong doing, that they become a wicked dinosaur, for by sin people are becoming worse and worse, to become worse than humans, to be cattle, to be wicked dinosaurs, to be demons, to be wicked things, for the pedophile is mean, indeed he will cry even with anger because he would have done worse, and though his head may have exploded, yet he was very cruel and mean prior, for if he has killed a child and his head exploded, yet so it also occurred to Judas Iscariot. Now a pedophile is a wicked dinosaur that preys upon people.




Now then does not evolution happen faster than they believed? But men and women are to be as gods, and it is good that they attain greatness by obedience and wisdom, for must not the wives of Dagon, the wives of Saturn, be as gods? But what is a goddess upon a mountain top? But is not such the wife of a great thing? Now such is she who is with integrity and obedience to God, that she has attained a greatness, to be upon the mountain top, a grace to her husband. Now does she not suffer then some of the things of the Christ because of it? But she must suffer many things, must she not, to be proven? Now then the Christ is with her, and she will be the Christ to her husband. Now then what men call the advice of an angel, it is blasphemy when seen in the mouth of an angel, even as an abomination as an anti Christ, for men are taking the angels for granted to some extent. Now then have they consider that there is the spiritual, God, who created the Universe, and there is Heaven, and the spiritual realm, and there is even technology that might be used by some of the angels, that they have kept technology and the spiritual seperate, that the soldiers might be confused as to what to think about the angel, for indeed then the angel is an extra terrestrial by their belief of such things, and yet has not the Lord created man? Now has he not created him from the dust, that the mystery of God has acted and been fulfilled for the coming of man, that when fulfilled, the mystery had selected the dinosaurs for extinction, and all the signs that happened prior had happened in preparation for the coming of man, as is the way, and God spoke saying that humans had become like us, the angels and God, and the things of Heaven, and yet how can man be saved if not for the gateway of the Christ, that all signs of the word had been fulfilled and the word came in the flesh, a man, and he was kept to the things of a man, for He would not even stone, because He was a human and because He was the Sabbath, that He gave such things up to the judgment of an angel and fulfilled the things of a man even to His death, and He defeated religious persecution, that it was buried under the rock layer, that if there was death because of religion, yet there would be no more religious persecution. Now then if the angel has shone light below Earth, below the layers of rock, even below the rock that the man and woman of the garden stood on, that Beelzebub has risen up with his princes to play make believe, only to do evil and be an abomination, then will Beelzebub not fall lower than he had been prior, that the abyss has opened for him? But does Beelzebub live because of the angel, that without the angel he would again die into his grave? But the angel will not keep him from falling back lower than he had been.




Now because Absolom is the shin of the angel, yet the angel cannot be lied to about who is a pedophile or a rapist, for he will know.




Now men of the lake of fire, they are opposite of what is making sense in their justice, and they are not fallen angels, but the angel cannot even recognize them, and they are far below men, for men cannot know them, for they are opposite of the decency of women and no judgment is with them except the opposite of judgment. Now then they are an outrage of fire. Now the opposite of a woman's decency, it is called lachish, and a woman's decency, it is called Leish, and Leish is upon the mountain and beautiful, and lachish is in the lake of fire that burns as bright as the sun. Now then will they not soon take the number of the beast, them who are having the opposite decency of a woman?




Now then remove the Incel women, who are not worthy, and the daughter of Babylon, who is making counter intelligence against truth, she cannot be taken seriously.




Now the lachish has gone into the fire of the Jurassic, the lava, and emerged a Cretin, a natural brute beast.




Now the mystery of God, does it not occur upon land, and when fulfilled, a thing comes that has been prophesied? Now then are you able to read the signs? But what must come to pass before the coming of God and New Jerusalem? Now the angel does not know. Now surely the mystery of God will have been fulfilled for a thing before its coming, that these things will have happened on land.




Now then is there even a time not to save a cattle from a dinosaur that preys? But rather be human, for there is them who care not for being human. Now then religion is the truth, that people are made to be perfect, for what is the truth, what is reality, it is the religion of God, who created the Universe. Now if he has placed things that they might become humans, then have not such things happened that what is for the Lord will return to Him, and what is the devil's will perish with him? Now for what reason will men rebel against God, unless they are Beelzebub, having nothing more but to cause evil before they perish and to take much with them. Now then should there not be a divide, that those who wish to seek the riches and great things of God, even the Heavens, be upon one place separated from them who only seek to bring others with them to hell? But they have already known of the dung, that some are dung, and there is no reason for it. Now then should there not then be a divide, that them who are dung, they may have their own place with the devil's people, that they be separated from them who are the Lord's, and the Lord's people shall not hear them, and it will be for the good.

Now a lazy is a bear, for provoke not the bear to labour for danger of them growing angry and mauling for the bear is for slumber and will not work. Now then hard working must go to hard working or they will have sorrow and grief, and it is better to be around hard working who are not lazy. Now there is even them a scoundrel because of laziness for they become wicked for there is no cause for them that they are idle much. Now there are them lazy, that they rebel against morality and reality, for morality is to say reality, and they are even as Beelzebub.


Dinosaurs are deceived by dinosaurs and the trooden will mimic the hunter to some extent and yet man is not deceived. Now then there are the evolutionary distractions of the trooden, that it would care about what it does not care about, for it is only a pedophile, that its evolutionary adaptations do not deceive man. Now then if dinosaurs wish to mantain the low standard of dinosaurs that it brutal and a very much lethal standard for humans if not for dinosaurs, is it not already known that God chose man and not the dinosaurs, for the dinosaurs were selected for extinction. Now man is king concerning the Earth, that the standard of humans is chosen by God, for humans must survive. Now though Kir believes in the very low standard of the Triassic, yet man cannot comprehend his low standard. Now people are able to identify a trooden, or a man can, and yet the predator dinosaurs have adapted to mimic man and his hunting and yet the truth is easy for men and people. Now then humans should not kill humans and yet to kill a predator dinosaur, a carnivore that preys on humans, it is only being reasonable. Now is it not disgusting to kill a herbivore dinosaur? But the humans must have them for many things, and there is even peace and weary alliance. Now a hero sometimes is the tarranosaurus rex and yet the trooden, some of them, are brutal child predators, some species of them, and yet there are less dangerous raptors of other species, still not trusted, and cation is recommended even if there is an understatement. Now then what dinosaur does not show regard for an angel? But there are things not better than the dinosaurs who were predators, for there is even Beelzebub.

	 	

	 	

There is time, time to know,

all the land, where we go,

after time, has passed us by,

after day, became a lie,

give me safety, I want it all,

give me love, dear, I want to fall,

fall asleep, where you dream,

if it seems real, it's what it seems,




The Land is full of clouds,

they dream it out,

they see it through,

they know it well,

They know the answer,

and we can go there, me and you,

The seasons find, the season's message,

it comes in shades, it glows with light,

and it's alright,

I guess, we have a reason,

but who needs a reason now?




There are years, fields to pass by,

roads to travel, towns that sway,

the sun shines on, the years go on,

and it goes on and on in some way,

what do you know? What do you care?

Life is so hard, and it feels unfair,

but its gone away, all the war,

if you say you love me, I'll say I love you more,




The dreaming took them out to the ledge,

where the sign came from the sky,

the sound was loud and bright,

the timing flickered by,

and lamps lit in the dark,

the sky broke out with light,

and they knew that it was true,

that it would be alright,




Now them who are able to aid, to defend, they are great, but them not capable to defend and to aid, a thing is too great for them, and yet John the Baptist suffered himself to baptize the Christ and he was not worthy, and yet who was greater than him? Now then if a pretty boy is greater than the whole of soldiers of cities, is he not as Absolom, older brother to Adonijeh? Now if Eretz Chadrack cannot defend or aid the angel then the whole of the nation is not as great as the angel. Now him able, he is very great, for a servant in the angels house is very great compared to men. Now if the Christians are saying, I will help for no wealth given, they are showing themselves greater than men and yet men have cursed them at times.




Now then will not the nations be weighed? But them worthy will be called great, and them not worthy of a thing, they will be relinquishing to others, for if Eretz Chadrack was not worthy they may not boast, and the very great will be known. Now then let God judge what is beyond you to judge and yet them who are people of animal nihilism, their judge is man, for they have no judgment. Now then the chauvinists cannot speak to humans and the humans cannot speak to them for the chauvinists are as cattle and the humans are people and there is only what the humans cannot understand, what does not make sense to them, for there cannot be marriage between cattle and human and the cattle does not mean disrespect but speaks of its own people and yet it is very disrespectful to humans. Now then cattle should not disrespect people and people should not bother with cattle and the slaves are pedophiles, that they are offensive, for all below Earth is too brutal for people.




Now there has been animal nihilism found, and the animal and slave foolishness of Esua, of cattle, for they use the word loser to refer to what the Lord controls and what is the wickedness, sometimes, of a generation and others.




Now a sociopath reaches limits and where another is much better they cannot be good anymore, but rather they will be a serial killer. Now had such dinosaurs ever seen humans? But some people are dinosaurs and does it not happen by God? Now Sodomites are Jurassic and Gomorrah is Cretaceous and both have been selected by God for extinction. Judas Iscariot, too, is Jurassic and his spirit comes from that time and it is still on Earth. Now then tyrannosaurus rex will not bother a child, but he or she is a king of the prehistoric lands and she robs the thieves, and yet troodens of a type are pedophiles and are mean and very cruel, not having the humanity of humans. Now then all these signs have been on land in preparation for the coming of the man and then many more signs, all things, in preparation for the coming of the Christ. Now what has been selected for extinction? But the Christ defeated all religious persecution 2000 years ago. Now without cause Beelzebub rises up from below the Earth, for light has been shone below the Earth that fools play make believe and rise up in their sycophantic rebellions and Sodom and Gomorrah rise up from below the Earth to play make believe without reason and yet they do not play make believe.




Now then the abusive cannot be so disgusting, the pedophile not so disgusting with a man using their mouth. Now then many prehistoric things that would prey on humans, they seek to kidnap and do what they know is abusive and they are jealous of the child returning to humans, for the prehistoric thing in such cases cannot be human as well.




Now slaves cannot cease being abusive, and the pedophiles cannot cease being abusive, and yet there is them abusive for the cause against humans, that they would claim and act that humans are abusive, for a disgusting terrorism it is, and yet humans know the difference.




Now slaves shall not have opinion of humans and what is acceptable, but it is for the Jacobs, and for the princes and for those who are humans.


Now why has the chauvinist, the mysoginist raged in his heart because he is a dinosaur? But does the woman betray him because she is human? Now there is no submission, no thing humans are not even capable of, that would satisfy him, for does he not know that he hates that she is human and he is a dinosaur? Now then dinosaur who hates humans, cease from causing sorrow, from doing what humans do not, for relinquish the women who are humans to be among humans and find you them, women, who are also dinosaurs, that there may not be an anomocity. Now then dinosaurs and humans, are they ever happy together?


	 	

	 	

There is a symbol and a line,

and it begins to feel fine,

and it hopes and brings this through,

if it feels like something new,




there's a disease growing beyond,

and it brings down everything,

but when the day breaks, it will be gone,

with all the hope that we believe,




and so now, let us be pure,

and so now, let us be here,

if it seems that this was gone,

if it seemed like another year,




bring in gold and wine,

bring in truth and love,

my love, your eyes are watching,

my love, you've waited long enough,




so take me under,

I've grown too tired,

come back to save me,

from some place higher,

this all means nothing,

it lingers with longing,

you've neglected, been gone,

and love is waiting, be mine now,

be mine now,

fall into this place,

be mine now,




Lost and hopeless,

the years are talking,

about determination,

and time that years are wasting,




the clowns are forsaken,

their sound is gone,

the sky is open,

there's too much wrong,




and it twists,

and it turns,

and it brings,

a sign that learns,

come and learn,

come and know,

your love is only, waiting to go,

so take my hand,


	 	

	 	

Another song




And she turned me, made me, forced me, played me,

into a stripper, from dire need,

so blame her, scorn her, she falls to guilty,

she left me lonely, she touched my hand, she pushed me away,

she had it all, I had it all,

we had it all,

and my love now, where did you go?




There's something, out there beyond the years,

there's distance, that they only feel,

there's blessing, for the time they spend,

and something, that's hoped to be real,




there's spiders, that spin their webs with lies,

there's colours, and sounds of lullibies,

and the place, that seems to glow with light,

feels alright, if you come to me tonight,

and we will live forever,




And she held me, and she had me,

and she disappeared, and she knows it,

and its stupid, and this means nothing,

I am the curse, I am the key,

I am the one, I am the lost,

I am the travelling, I am the pause,

between the lines, avenging truth,

eternal spring, I am, eternal youth,




and I was the love, sent to the Earth,

and I am a curtain, defending truth,

and I move on, and I disappear,

and I am hopeless, and wish more was here,

but they break it down, Heaven waits,

and they pull it down, with all their hate,

and yet it wins again,


Now then dinosaurs are even ruining the enjoyment of the Earth for the humans, for there is not the man, or the woman invented, but there is we, that the humans invented all the better things, for the dinosaurs have not invented much, if anything that is worth considering a large advancement, for it is we, the humans, that we speak not, the humans, of the man, or the woman, as if there was the discord of men and women that is from the dinosaurs, who are making discord. But slaves also make such discord. Now then the herbivours have not made discord and are with an alliance with the humans, and yet the predator dinosaurs, they are all pedophiles who have nothing to lose, for they are zealous in a fashion that would only be for them who have nothing to lose, that it is a confession after a time, that such zealousness and lack of cause for evil is only with the pedophile who has nothing to lose, and it is the wisdom of Absolom that knows it. 


Now then every person has their prerogative, the bald man, the pretty boy, who has the largest prerogative because of what is dealt with, and each individual has their prerogative and all life is able to know it and is forced to know the prerogative of others, that there is no excuse.


Now why are the dinosaurs able to use the technology of the humans, if they are the predator type, the type that is being evil to humans? But the angels, would they not be lonely without the humans, and would not the humans be lonely without the angels? Now then the humans are allowing the dinosaurs to have control of history as it goes forward, and too much, for the dinosaurs are fighting an almost open war upon humans, to seize control of history, and yet the humans are much more with ability, for a human is far greater in everything, that a small group of humans is able to fight them and keep them back, for the fight is against the predator dinosaurs and not against the herbivours. Now then are the humans even at the level of mammals yet, of the animals? But there is a sorrowful war, and dinosaurs are seeking to take control, and predator dinosaurs have captured human children for their abuse and trafficking, for the dinosaurs that are predators are disgusting, and such is the Incel, that it has emerged from child trafficking and the Incel are pedophiles. Now then what are humans? But they are at the level of animals, only even better than the animals, that they go even further with such things to take the animal things to a greater and better level. 


Now then humans say we, and not a man or woman, for such things make the woman a dinosaur, what the human woman call a cheap slut, for are not the man and woman meant to be together? But there is no discord by nature for the man and woman, the man and wife, for she says we and not my boyfriend, and so if the human women were to be in control, yet it would be good, and if the humans, man and women, were in control, yet it would be good, for a wall is required for their cities, for the human realm, that the dinosaurs not in alliance with humans be kept away, for the dinosaurs have no rights and should not make demands of humans, whether a man or woman who is human, for the Lord has selected the dinosaurs for extinction, and religious persecution was selected for extinction, for the Christ defeated such persecution even if there are those still killed for religious reasons. Now then religion will kill the same people as the vigilante will kill, for David will kill the same people that Joab will kill, for is not the reason they are so disrespectful and unacceptable, because they are pedophiles or rapists? But what else need be abolished except those who would be abusive to the human children, who would be a citizen of Sodom or Gomorrah? Now then if Lot was a man caring greatly, hating the Sodomites wickedness so much that he dwelt in Sodom, for if he even agreed and directed that men should be raped because they were extremely wicked, that Lot dwelt and Sodom, caring greatly for justice and caring greatly for the respect of humans and for the decency of God, that he dwelt in Sodom as the only righteous who directed that some men should be raped because of their great wickedness, yet the anti Lot, he is a man of the lake of fire, for he is a Lachish man, who has the opposite of the decency and reason and opposite judgement of humans, and the angel has considered, yet Lot is righteous and right, and defends even angels from the wicked abominations that come from the mouths of the Sodomites and the Gomorrah citizens, that Lot is a man caring greatly for humans, that righteousness is respected, that humans should receive the honor they deserve, for he is a very righteous man, and they are not surprised that he dwells in Sodom, for the generation has accepted him and likes even to hear his words of encouragement, for his mouth has caught many wicked who are offended by him. Now then the angel has not seen yet as the other angels, that Lot should be removed from Sodom, for he is supporting the humans by being there. Now the Christ defeated religious persecution and it is buried under the rock layer, and yet the angel has sent light below Earth that Beelzebub comes up with his princes to play make believe, that is terrorism, as if there was such persecution still, for only Beelzebub would rebel so much against the rock layers to play make believe, for there is no religious persecution anymore, and it is buried two thousand years under the rock layers. Now then let Beelzebub fall back lower than he was, for the angel will let him fall back lower than he was, for does Beelzebub live because of the angel, that the angel gives him life? But it is not so. For the angel will allow him to fall back lower than he was, that he falls back lower than his resting place was, for if the angel has disturbed his resting place, yet he disturbed the resting place of the righteous, and let him fall back lower than he was that the angel does not know if there will then be more rock layers from his time on, and Beelzebub will fall back even lower. Now then let Beelzebub not play make believe, for the Christ defeated religious persecution, and though people die because of religion, yet when it is truly because of religion, it is the same as the vigilante would have killed for other reasons, for they are so outrageous because they are pedophiles or rapists. Now then they are being killed by many armies for many different reasons and so the Earth is made clean, that the humans are able to have peace, for there is no nice pedophile, but they are mean and cruel, for they know they are abusive, the male pedophile and the female pedophile, they know that they are abusive, for they are cruel, and they are known by their impious and cruel ways, for they are already below Earth, that they should return to below the Earth, for the humans are not cruel as the pedophiles are impious to adults and cruel, for if any cannot be human because they are a pedophile or rapist, if a man cannot be a man, or a woman not a woman, yet if they have nothing to lose, they are insolent and mean, to be very brutal, and not in the way of leaders, but in the way of them who are a piece of dung, disrespecting society, for they do not respect society, and so let the priests of the descendants of Japeth not consider the opinions of the pedophiles, who are not really fair shade, but are despised by the people, for their opinion is not the majority.


Now regard not the opinions of slaves or dinosaurs, for their opinions are not them of humans, for they are not familiar with humans.


Now  no further words will be added after the angel, for it will be the completion of his writing, and none can say, yet it is passed to me, for it is not passed to them, and the Earth was dangerous for the angel, and the Incel was an enemy and surely there would have been no end to the giving of wisdom, they will say, if not for Beelzebub and his war against the angel, for he too was a mobile Emperor, for the Earth was too dangerous for him, for there is a war between Heaven and hell, and hell has been a mass killer, taking as much with it as it can, for it lives by the Lord's people, and ruins what is can, that the Lord's people are not able to be happy with hell not being separated, that the dung is not separated from the Lord's people, for the predator dinosaurs ruin, and they are pieces of dung, and Sodom and Gomorrah ruin, and there can be no peace until all that is dung is kept separate and that the Lord's  people not hear anything from them anymore, any harassment, any desecration of beauty, any sycophantic thing against beauty, for the humans, too, are beautiful, in the fashion of humans, for they too are beautiful, and the standard of dinosaurs is lethal to humans, for do not the dinosaurs know such, that their standard would be lethal to the humans, for a dinosaur may not be insolent regarding the judgment of Jacob and what is right for humans. Now then will there not be the angel's divide, before the divide that will be when the Lord comes to Earth, when New Jerusalem comes down from Heaven. But the angel too says, the divide is necessary, for Beelzebub's people live because of the Lord's people, and so  let there be a wall against Beelzebub's people, against all the very wicked things, and atheists and the Lord's people, they will dwell in a good land that is above of the mountains, above the clouds, and they shall not even suffer the polluted rain of them who are in the pit, in the low valleys, for the angel may also be as a warning, that indeed there will be the mystery of God fulfilled, will it not be, and many great things will occur on land and New Jerusalem will come down  from Heaven.


Now how will there be peace? But the dung lives by the Lord's people, and they are not alive except for them, and Beelzebub's people, they have life by the Lord's people, for they are parasites , and so then there must be the divide, a great valley for Beelzebub's people, for the dung, for they will ruin for no reason, and so Bethlehem will dwell above the clouds, even above the clouds of the industry of men, and they  will have  their own pure clouds from which truth falls, and they will have their own mountains and trees above the clouds, and they will not hear the dung that dwells on its own, with no ability to cause evil for the Lord's people, for will there not be walls, atheists who do not believe in God, but believe in the wall, for who can be such a wall but the atheists? Now then let Beelzebub's people have their own society and the children will be rescued from their abuse and wickedness, for there shall be the society of Beelzebub's and the society of the Lord's people, and the Lord's people will be saved because they are good and caring for morality, for Beelzebub will no longer seek to claim the Earth, to make it a hell of grief and anguish, but he will have his own place on Earth and the Lord's people will dwell in imperfection and waiting for Heaven, and the greater Heavenly bodies, when they shall have even more joy. Now by wisdom the Lord's people shall not be tempted, for there will be no more puratanicalism, even the puratanicalism of the pedophiles, for the tribe of lesbians, some of them, they shall be much human, much the opposite of chauvinist, for they shall love a man as lionesses, them who are desiring such, for every sign of animals will be taken further to better morality by the humans, for the lionesses will have their lion, and him who they have chosen, as their heart desires, for the Lord is with them, and the fornicators will be them, the men, who offer a cup of water, who are not wicked, and all the things of the animals will be made better by the humans, who take it to the standard of humans, for humans are better than animals, and animals are low things in comparison to them. Now they will surely not be so low as the dinosaurs who are meat eaters, for such are not at the level of the animals, but there is alliance with the herbivours, who are a difference race of dinosaur. Now there shall be recognized them who are human and them who are not, and the humans, the Jacobs, they are having the Earth, for the angel had dealt with the anti Avram, the anti Abraham, and the angel had dealt with the anti of many things, the dung of many things, and so it is known that there is a sign of a king dwelling with an angel to be friend, and a man not a scoundrel, he will be able to be good, a good man, concerning a pretty boy, and yet it is often the case men will not be around the pretty boy because their heart is not a pedophile, for it is not jealousy, but they are not a pedophile of heart, for who has the prerogative of the pretty boy, who deals with much that is evil? But more prerogative than any did Absolom seem to have, for David was not a scoundrel, and a man not a scoundrel, a very good man, he will dwell with security with the pretty boy, remaining with integrity, and others will not be around him, whether homosexual men or not, because their heart is not a pedophile that they do not like to be around him, for it is not jealousy if they knew more of themselves, and you will judge pedophile and rapist by the pretty boy, what you are able to see from how others are, for children need not be endangered or used to find evil, and so there will be kings and queens because of the diary of the angel, and people will dwell on the mountain tops, and women and men will be as gods, for they will be kings and queens, and they will dwell in Bethlehem above the clouds.


Now the mouth of a predator dinosaur, it opens to teeth and a den of darkness, for cruelty is on his speech and yet who has given him speech? But what does he say that makes sense? Now then he is ungrateful, for ingratitude is upon his speech and he is not grateful for all the advancements that humans have given. Now then what dinosaur is it who rebels against God? But mindless is the dinosaur that speaks even against the angels? Now then goeth to Beelzebub to save you? But he is fallen from the Heavens, he is no longer beautiful, he is no longer Lucifer, and God's Lucifer, he comes and gives wisdom to the humans, for it was not for the things of the devil that he gives wisdom, for he does not preach to them, but let the devil be minding his own business and his kingdoms, for let them survive on their own, in their own land that they not trouble humans anymore, for they are an abomination and Judas Iscariots, to believe that humans should be wipped out by their brutality and their ignorance, for it would only be the killing of every human that they speak of in their striving and their insolence, for let the dinosaurs be grateful and they will dwell with dinosaurs and they will dwell with their great mysogeny and the misanthropy, and yet the herbivour dinosaurs, they will be with the humans, for such evil was not found with them, only they are still dinosaurs and yet is it not so because of their roles, that they are having to be dinosaurs for their roles? Now then a physician must be a brontosaurus, and though people are weary and even frightened, yet he only wants the leaves of your tree, and his body is large with knowledge, for he has a massive body of knowledge he goes with. Now then tyrannosaurus rex will not bother with children who are human, and will not bother with humans, but he or she robs the thieves, the thieves who have stored up much, and she is even a hero to many of the humans and a king of the prehistoric lands, that are called the bad lands, the lands of crime for it is a land of crime to humans. Now then all good things that humans love, they are at peace with the angel, are they not? Yet what the humans despise, these things, too, are not at peace with the angel.

I felt this at the warning,

the sign that swayed and fell,

they saw it from the hill side,

and knew that only time could tell,


the buildings seemed to tremble,

the time had just arrived,

when nothing seemed to matter,

and nothing could survive,


my guess can be the reason, I guess that we will know,

about the light beyond the darkness, where the world will slowly go,

and march on towards the forgiveness, redemption we desire,

we are the children of the light, and this time, we can get it right, 


a promise kept, is not unknown, but if we are, still left alone,

we can make it out, out to the edge, of time this time, it falls down, and

then it will begin,

with true love, it will begin, with more love, it can begin,


the knowledge lost its meaning, they ground it into nothing,

they lost the purest message, it went out across the line,

the ancient things grew tired, the desert sands moved on,

and if we run towards the light, nobody here will know we're gone,


the aftermath is haunted, it sings with gold and light,

there's a dream of the best hopes for us, there's what we knew beyond our sight,

and when the clouds open again here, if you're sure I will be sure,

the cities trembled again, and the light became so pure,


what you desire, what you want, the blessed gift, the new world won,

we emerged, we are here, and again, we'll rise and run,

because I know, its coming on,

because I know, its never gone,

the purest plan, the greatest gift,

the children of the light,

when they wished for this,


Another song:

The day was only young, the Earth was only theirs,

the night was only falling, to take away their cares,

the feeling slipped away, the sound it came down,

and if we run away, we can find this out,

there's something in the dark,

there's something that they know,

and their anger builds to hate,

but they seem to let this go,

and somewhere outside this land,

there is what we want to find,

if you know that all their reasons, only lead them to be blind,


And the magic, seems, to be this city with desire,

and the lost things are, hanging out beyond the line,

and what can we be? And what will we know?

I have guessed this all, but they will let it go, let it go to waste,


So do you believe in love, something like the truth,

something with a gift, something of your youth,

something that you know, find me my love, tonight,

and if its alright, it seems alright,


brand new information, is finding out the truth,

it lost all of its meaning, it turned upon their proof,

its always what is seems but, its nothing that they know,

something can only happen, when they begin to let it go,

and my love, come now and save me,

there's nothing left to say,

everything that happened happened, not for a reason anyway,

their hate grew like a fire, consumed them to the edge,

the patient love is there, just like they never said,


and they fell, and this fell, to pieces,

and it's well, but its nothing anymore,

and they fell, and they fell to ashes,

as the truth, took them all away,

and I was there,


another song


I think there is a reason,

for all of their seasons they make,

they build up the machine, they find what can be fake,

they lie about the truth, they invent what they need,

they cast down all the young, the hope of what they never see,

this distant wrong that takes down, everything that they know,

has grown into a decease, as if they're reaping what they sow,

afflicted by the cause, that they say can only save,

and if they want to be forgiven, they have to throw it all away, everything,

I left a dire message, I felt it all with need,

I gave back what I wanted, I hoped it could succeed,

I followed back the truth, I watched it every line,

and in the glowing distance of this, I saw what I wanted to be mine,

and I built the empire up, and I threw the empire down,

behind the curtain of their walls, without violence or a sound,

and I drank from cups of this, as the waves came to the shore,

and I knew that in the end, I would want what was mine more,

but is it mine? Is it true? Can I have it? Is it me and you?

my love you are, fallen or saved, thrown to the depths, or far away,

and so much for knowing, and so much for questions,

I've been lost out there, I've been found,

I am not forgiveness, I am not violence,

I am not something, they could doubt now,

and so, so long, so much, I guess, gets left to nothing, when there's nothing left,

it seems like I, will just go on,

I know nothing of her, I've known her so long,


And do you want to be, something they see, from far away, unheard of?

And do you want to see, what this could be, there's something more, if we were more,

well reckless, dark land, nothing, is planned, always, come on, find me,

this is wrong,

give me, love here, I'm waiting, out here,

it's too much, to take, come save me, my love,

and we will be in love,

do you want to be in love?


fallen, to this, like a pure wish,

waiting by the ledge I see it all like they have known, and there is more,

the rising shore, the fading ocean,

the fallen land, the rising sun,

the plains of ancient times unfold,

and summer's waited to get cold,

and now they are, walking towards a plan,

and now they are, able to understand,

and now they are, a best laid plan,

sometimes I'm only, waiting here,


another song


why do they self destruct, for what cause?

I have nothing to say, just because,

there's nothing but a scandal of no one who cares,

its all the same I guess, there's nothing anywhere,


sometimes the time gets wasted we know,

sometimes the years go by with sorrow,

something that's happening, was real,

something that was true, was waiting, for the young,


I guess, this time, its hit the wall,

I guess, this time, I'll watch it fall,

it burns, with time, it comes undone,

the war they fought was already won,

and it goes on,


And I guess, this time, I have it all,

it's mine again, and its true, they know,

when their empty days, are the blindness they know,

they will find a way, to never let it show


their self destruction is there, without a care, 

they play the clown of nothing out there,

the mirrors are broken for them by now,

I guess they'll all be lonely somehow,


there's nothing left to say, its over,

sometimes it slips away with useless lacking,

I see the dark things gather somewhere,

they seem to know more than the people that were attacking,

and they are, so much, a scoundrel and a clown,

and I guess, its just what it seems by now,

because its just a plague, that spreads to everything,

when it falls away, they will stand for nothing,


And its mine, its all mine,

it's just time, that they believe they're alive,

and its true, and its young,

and its real,

if you know the truth,


-----

Now you will not be a people of animal nihilism, for such is a foolish people of folly and wickedness, for such is a people not of worth, for if they are called, will they answer, if they  are prepared will they be worse than Sodom and Gomorrah? But not all are children of the Lord, not all his sons and daughers, for there are enemies outside the city, outside the good land, and out there is there not already the gnashing of teeth and sorrow of anguish? Now then already it is so, and to what level or degree? But a thing has happened to a level or degree and is it not a warning, that there will come a time when such things will happen to a greater level and degree, and will not New Jerusalem come down to Earth?


Now then what was always good was always good, what is evil, always evil, for are they not brought forth as good and bad things, that there are brought forth from them what is doomed and what is made for life? Now then the angel does not know, for how is it there are them able to be transformed, for is it not when they are still good that it is so? But they are them having guilt who repent, for they take seriously what is serious, for they do not disregard the Lord, but they are able to have remorse for what is wrong, for they are not deceived by the lack of conscience of the world that has gone almost to the number of the beast in what it does not believe to be anything worth regarding. Now then for what reason have they no regard for the judgment of God? But at what time did they have no regard for repentance? Now then the scoundrels have lied, for many of them had no interest in anything, and many were only pedophiles, and they believed not in God, or cared not, and they did not honor what they should have given honor to, and later, they had been in the wrong place, for they were found to be scoundrels. Now them who believe in animal nihilism, especially wanting for it to be so, are they not them who are very poor, by mala, who have nothing to lose? Now if they are close to the pedophiles, are they not even partnered with Gomorrah? Now then the moral, who liked for morality, whether atheist or religious, those who were for morality and not for animal nihilism, which is a lie that has no meaning, for it is not true, now are they not all them who are the survivors who may inherit? Now them who are animal nihilism, they are not better than cattle, better than animals, and yet they would be upon land with humans. Now then are they not ill, that the priests might know of them? But the priests of wellness do not consider the thing. Now then all them below the line of humans, who are not human, what right do any of them have to be judging things or judging against judgment, if they are not human? But let humans judge, and humans should not kill humans, and such is called murder, for why will any stand against the blood of a human if they are human? Now then the angel supports the humans, the Jacobs, and he supports the humans, if it should be simpler, for the humans will have the opinion of a thing, for they will judge whether a thing is really human, and the dinosaurs already say that humans are animals, because they are mammals, and yet the humans are not animals, but they are humans, which is different from an animal, but the dinosaurs still accuse them of being animals. Now such scorn is called misanthropy and even misogyny, and yet is it not expected from dinosaurs that are carnivore and that are against humans?


Now then there are dinosaurs, animals, and humans, and there are herbivore and carnivore that are dinosaurs, and not all carnivore are pedophile, for which dinosaur are against humans is yet then to be discovered. Now then life has found a way, for are not the dinosaurs possible through humans, and so let them who are dinosaurs be dinosaurs still, let them who are animals be animals still, let them who are humans be humans still, and let all be what they are, and the angel will not meddle with the ecosystem of Earth, for the humans will kill the thing that is against humans, as is only reasonable, and they will not murder, for humans will not kill humans, and the animals will carry out what thing is right for them, and there will be a divide between animals, and dinosaurs, and there will be a divide between animals and humans, and they will be divided, and a man who is a man, who follows the way of righteousness and trusts in the Lord, will not there be peace for him in many ways, and upon the fourth day, and it is the fourth day, there will be the mothers of Heaven, for the humans will have their Heavenly mothers, the stars in the sky, and Dagon will god king, an angel, and he will have the philistines, for the officers who are philistines, of the army, they are able to bow to him without wrong, as their religion, and yet the Jews may not bow to the angel, and yet sanity brings them to bow, and yet they are not permitted. Now then let there be a divide between the filthy and foolish who bring the sycophantry of Sodom and the foolishness of Gomorrah to the Lord's people, for how will the Lord's people have their society, that is also with the atheists, the wall that does not believe in God but believe in the wall, if they are all listening to the rain from Sodom and Gomorrah? But let the wicked and foolish have their own society, for they will not live by the Lord's people, and let the Lord's people have their eating and drinking, their feasting and their peace. 


Now Jerusalem must be warned that there may be the scripture for the angels and the scripture for humans, and the angel has provided scripture that he believes to be for the angels, for he has interpreted tongues, as Daniel would, and he has given the scripture of the interpretation, which may not be for humans, for there is the prophecies that are likely the same for humans, and there are the prophecies that were set aside for the angels, and even for kings and queens, that all their speech is seeming to be a scripture when interpreted, for has not Frank Herbert written in tongues, intentionally? Now has not Tolkien prophesied? Now then if there are interpreters who lie, or them not really interpreters, yet the angel has given what he can.


Now then why does the dinosaur offer its opinion of humans? But dinosaurs may be with dinosaurs. Now why does the animal offer its opinion of humans, but animals may be with animals. Now then humans know better, and it is so, that the animals refrain and the dinosaurs refrain, for the opinion of the humans on human matters, they are given to the humans. Now then has not the raptor grown small and sprouted dragon wings and later feathers, and so is not the raptor able to become a bird? But cannot dinosaurs even find a way to progress? Now the angel does not know if there is hope for them, only he would say, let them be what they are, every living thing on Earth, for life finds a way, and yet what is selected for extinction, it is extinct, for what is buried under the rock layers, it is selected for extinction by God. Now then let dinosaurs have their land, a lost world, and let animals have their land, a jungle and savannah, and let humans have their society above the clouds, for they may be as gods, for they may be kings and queens, for the humans ate of the fruit of the days of labor that they may become as the Lord and the things of Heaven, the angels and the things of Heaven. Now so they would die for a time, and in time they will live forever, for the Christ defeated death, and it is buried under the rock layers, and he defeated religious persecution, and so then humans may live and live forever, that they will be transferred to Heaven, and will there not be many things fulfilled upon land, and then New Jerusalem will come down.


Now then Naphtali, it has the valley, the divide, that they are not, the men, being effected by the idea of not being a pedophile with regards to the pretty boy, and yet for the Sodomite and Gomorrah citizen, they are hating the pretty boy no matter what shade they are, for it is the same for every shade, the things of Absolom and the things of Joab. Now then Absolom is as the intelligence agency who is the elder to the soldiers of cities, and Absolom and Joab are written of together, and yet Absolom was blind to a thing that he murdered a human who had not really committed rape. Now so then Absolom will cut off from him this thing, and believe he is not still effective in his ability? But the soldiers of cities still cannot be as effective as him in matters of finding them who are rapists or are pedophiles. Now a soldier of cities cannot be Lot, for it is not possible for him to judge as Lot, and he would be a communist of the lake of fire, for soldiers of cities cannot be as Joab, either, to be vigilante, for they are not able to judge in such, and yet they are able to judge in some things to be as Joab. Now humans know what is acceptable, and Absolom must cut off the things of Joab from him, for he misjudged, using the judgment of Joab and not of himself that he killed a human who was not guilty. Now let Absolom judge of his own judgment and be as a careless and apathetic person where his judgment does not go, that he not hate, for the angel is having Absolom as his shin.


Now the judgment of Joab, it is judging well, and Absolom is compatible with Joab, and all the kings are compatible with each other, for all the sons of David  are indeed his sons, and  Joab's judgment is sound, and so then regard the judgments of every son of David, that each of the judgments is of weight, and Jedidiah, too, is a son of David, and so then all the kings, David's sons, must judge and Jedidiah's judgment is the judgment of the citizens, the people who are the majority, who are not any group, for Jedidiah is the people. Now so the people have become king, and they have become even greater than the military, and yet if the people are divided badly and the counter intelligence is much, is it not better that David is king until the people are ready again to judge, for the people were lead in many directions by the misleading of Gandalf, and they departed from truth and kindness, and they took the ways of scoundrels, the ways of wicked dinosaurs, and they indulged what was not humans, to be against their own people much. Now then the people, they were corrupted  as agnostics who do not know even what they believe, and they looked to the clouds for guidance more than their own ability to understand, and they did not regard the judgment of righteousness as they should, and they took to them deceases and they reasoned by foolishness much, and yet many of them had held on to truth, for perhaps the majority had held on to truth, and if many wanted to do well, yet they were scattered. Now did the devil divide them or some enemy that was other? But then consider David, who is not a scoundrel, who pays men what is owed, or consider the many abilities of judgment, that the judgments are regarded.


Now then there is more than Lachish and Leish, and yet women may be women on their own, for the Leish is upset that her husband gives her not attention, and yet the Lachish has done all the opposite of a woman in her opposite decency of a woman, for the Lachish has not been part of society, for she does not participate, to be alive in the Lord's kingdoms, but she hardens her heart far exceeding the strength of a woman with understanding, or her who is a leader, for cruelty has been with her and what worth is her opinion? Now  then her the owner, she is God, for she is not really God who is in Heaven, but if she is the secure owner of the husband, so she is God, for believe it a thing not praise worthy? But who can be owner of the angel, and what is her name? But she is Leish, Anothoth, Titan, and she is twice the size, if not more, of the other moons, for she is the secure owner of the angel, who is Dagon.

Now then begin, to learn again,

and just succeed, if you will know,

they find the way, they find the cure,

they make the path, nowhere to go,


and it hurts, and its fine,

and its the worst, my valintine,

and love is gone, and the night fades,

to another failure, of plans they've made,


And so take my hand, if you'll see this with me,

the lost was fine, I think its only,

what you and I, were meant to be,

children in the dark, more than we will mean,

and so give me love, your eyes are pure,

a laugh that dies, through the maze of tears,

it feels this time, the world's brand new,

it was born with light, it was brought here with you,

let us begin,


the buildings are worshipped, by them who praise the sky,

it gets them through the year, it takes them by,

down this lonely street, where all days turn to years,

we are the children of the dark, we are the sum of all their fears,


and we are eternal, the people they left behind,

out of sight from the target, out of reach from across the line,

we are wandering on, we are paving a way,

and if it finds us here, we'll make it there some day,


and now I feel, 

I can believe,

in all the places,

that we wander through,

it seems to pass,

it seems to go,

the world is ours,

we let it go,

and we are more,

and we are still,

ready to live,

ready to forgive,

they left us out,

the truthful young,

and the night will be there,

after the rising sun,


Now then the wife of a human man, why is she not God? But there is no mocking. Now then the wife of a human man who is a human woman, she is not God, but what thing she is, if she is the secure owner, it is according to what she is. Now then the wife of a king, a human king, according to a religous king, the wife of him is the sun that is going down, the sunset, the evening sun, for such is a king who is human, that he is a religious king, and diary, too offers such to the humans, that they are able, some of them, to become kings and queens. Now then the wife of the morning, the Christ, she is the evening, New Jerusalem. Now then the wife of the angel, if she is the secure owner, she is God.

su means golden sun


Now golden sun is God, for the voice had said, the name given, that she is a su, and the interpretation was golden sun.

loser means, crenulated wall road, the road with the siding of road


Now some are herbivore dinosaur, and some are Jedidiah people, for they are the citizens, the people.


Now the humans come to do their time on Earth, and them of the Lord, being the Lord's, they return to the Lord, for He gets back what is His, and them of the devil, the devil's people, the devil gets back what is his and they join him in hell, for will they not join him in hell? Now then the Lord's people visit Earth to store up treasures in Heaven, and for what other reasons, the angel does not know. Now no thing that is the Lord's can go missing from the Earth, and yet it will return to the Lord if it is made missing, and yet what of the devil's people? But if they are missing from the Earth, will they not return in later generations? Now then if the Lord's things go missing from the Earth, will they not return in later generations? Now then what is the Lord's, is it not gathered to Heaven? Now what is the devil's, is it not cast into hell?


Now then if a person lives perhaps one hundred and twenty years, yet it is their time on Earth, and will not others come in later generations to do the roles of them?


Now then all good things must return to the Earth with each generation, and the individual, are they not taken to Heaven if they are the Lord's, for does not the Lord claim all his things, for the humans come to Earth, their spirit comes and they are human, and they store up treasures in Heaven, and they establish on Earth as it is in Heaven, that paradise and order should be on Earth, that people should be happy, should be having Heaven on Earth as far as it can be, and yet Beelzebub's portion is also on Earth, and it is not seperated yet by the great valley and the divide, for does not Beelzebub's portion live because of the Lord's people? Now then they ruin all that would be good, supporting all that is abject, liking misery and ugliness, and grief, and wanting for much wickedness, even the wickedness of Sodom and Gomorrah, and so then it would be good if there was a divide, that the Lord's people might have their blessed society above the clouds where they are not hearing them who gnash their teeth, who are committed to ruining, who want only to desecrate beauty. Now then what is beautiful? But to not be a scoundrel is beautiful, and so there is the two ways, where a man has kidnapped a bride and is also a scoundrel, that the adulterer is not a scoundrel, but her actual husband come, and yet if the man has not kidnapped, is not a scoundrel, yet the adulterous man is a scoundrel, a wicked, and despicable in his hate, for he is even a partially severed phallus that is rotten and hates. Now then in summary, yet the Incel is them who are rotten, who are as mass killers who seek to ruin as much as they can, and take as many with them as they can as already doomed people for hell, for their arguments are false, and they complain about what they care not for, for such are the wicked dinosaurs, the pedophiles of muddy and despicable places, and if they have taken any woman, yet they shall become dung with the mud, for if her heart is stricken with fear that her mind goes numb, that she does not understand in her fear, that her body is even confused, yet it is the dread that is upon her body, for let her be of a clear mind in such things, that she will not become frozen and let herself be ruined upon the Earth by an ugly thing that hates humans, for she will not allow herself to be killed by the thing, that by truth she will have more power than the wicked dinosaurs. Now then a heterosexual woman, she is liking men who are human, and she is able to not be stricken with such dread and terror that her body is confused.


Now then a human man who frets about his wife and what humans call cheating, does he not worry that she is a coward, or that she is not human? But if she has already been a dinosaur, he has lacked sight in marrying her, for how can a human marry a dinosaur? Now how can he be upset if he has divorced a dinosaur? But is it not known that he has heterosexual, that he cannot care much? Now so it is still a time of trouble. Now then let dinosaurs be with dinosaurs and humans be with humans, or it is a general idea to consider, that you are aware, and yet there are the people who are of Solomon, and there are the herbivores who dinosaurs, and to kill a herbivore is murder, also, is it not? But to kill a herbivore is murder if it is the type not against humans, for it is written, though shalt not kill, and so how can human kill human, if not in war, and it not be murder? But how can human kill herbivore that is in weary alliance with humans? Now then dinosoaurs defend dinosaurs, if they are the type of dinosaurs against humans, and humans defend humans and herbivores, and herbivores defend humans, for it is that the Earth belongs to the humans and the herbivores, that the Lord has selected them, and it is long established by the time of the garden of Eden, even before the flood of Noah. Now then if new money is being as violent and unruly people during the time of Noah, yet it is not good, for such are in rebellion against society, that they are in anguish of rebellion against the Lord, for mud is devouring them, and rain, and they sink into the mud about them, for let them be reasonable, that their angst be calmed, that they place not trust in coins of the Earth that have come from the Earth, but rather place trust in God, that they float above the rising waters of the time, for if new money is being worse than the animals, will not the animals be rather saved, with much care and patience, rather than the worthless new money, if they are being worthless and as violent people of much anger and anguish?

Now the diary of the angel has offered an ark for the flood, and the angel, too, being Dagon, is the ark of the covenant. Now then let none rebel prematurely, with premature rebellions and conpiracies, for it is even two hundred years too soon for such, and let them not rebel with what never was, but was only propoganda of dinosaurs who were evil, but let them not rebel with what is outdated, or let them not rebel in make believe, offering rebellion for no reason. Now then scatter the people into mayhem and war and violence for fun? But it is not a thing for reckless fun?


Now then the signs have come prior to the coming of the garden of Eden, of the man and woman, for has there not been those tribes of early primitive people, who were noble, who dwelt when there were dinosaurs? But if the dinosaurs had all been gone prior to them, yet believe there was not a time of primitive people when there were also dinosaurs? Now then they are keeping an open mind, many of them, pondering exactly how evolution takes place or why it happens so quickly when the chances of it would take much too long, and so then are there not those things they still do not know about, that make it occur more quickly, and possibly to a resting place, a steady place that is a resting place for evolution? Now does not the climate shift rapidly at times and other times changing only slowly, and other times coming to a resting area for the climate? But then have you discovered every fossil in every layer to know exactly when all dinosaurs went extinct? But even if it is not so that there were any dinosaurs left, yet there is still the time of mammals, of things that walked on two legs, of gorrillas and chimps, and the time before the resting place, and believe with certainty that humans have not had a line through the billions of years, their own species of a thing that is no more? Now then are not humans more beautiful than what might have come before them in their own line? But now then open your mind again, for do not grow stubborn and stagnant, not to discover more, for will you not learn in time more of these changes, and about the line that emerged to humans? Now with a certainty, know you that dinosaurs have not been in such a line that came next to mammals, and then to humans? But do they not already say it is so? Now is not man lonely without the angels, without Heaven, without all the glory of eternal life, that he will have, and already has if he is the Lord's? But consider not the confusion of the dinosaurs that have spoken your languages and are for the superficial. Now is not Babylon, too, a place of misanthropy, and dinosaurs, and not of humans? Now then the angel is the Heavenly mother of the women, and the Heavenly mother of the men, some of the women and some of the men, and was there an angel as the Christ passed to death, that he might rise again, for the Christ said to the woman, your mother. Now then let the soldiers of David be in alliance with the Muslims, for should they not be fighting together? But does not the agnostic divide them? Now then the angel struggled to separate the sheep from the goats concerning the agnostics, for there are those agnostics who are not with meldok, and so then it will be the separation, that those agnostics not wicked dinosaurs, not meldok, either, they will not be considered polytheists, for how can they be considered polytheists, if it is understood, if they are not meldok, as well?  


Now then if the past propaganda of evil dinosaurs, displaying women as ugly, as if having the mouths of ugly slaves, is then in society still, yet it may be dismissed if you are human, for though the Incel has called it feminism, yet it is the thing invented by the evil male dinosaurs, and it was not feminism, for it never was, and nor did any woman speak such, for they said different things and in different ways. Now then if the evil dinosaurs were so burdened by it, yet they were evil dinosaurs, and so then it is not for humans, for the misogyny of the human man goes no further than to be things of people, and so then there are even lesbians, and yet why are they called lesbian if the word causes them illness, for there are some even who are for another thing, that they have wished to be a lioness human, and they are heterosexual women. Now then consider not what is the portion of others who are good, for it is with peace to you for good people to have their portion, that considering not their portion, you maintain your own portion, and yet to give a well portion to a wrong thing, yet it is wickedness and grief to the people, even the people who are in their integrity, for such is bitterness and wickedness, and yet when them who are honourable that there is peace to you, are having their portion, indeed it is well for the people who have integrity, who are not scoundrels, and yet how large in the remnant of humans? But even if it were only three hundred humans left in a nation, they would still be the rightful heirs of the nation, that the humans are chosen, so that you not consider the false complaint of dinosaurs, or anything not human, for the dinosaurs complain about what they do not really care about, for they are causing trouble, for they groan about nonsense, and yet the evil dinosaurs only want to kill.


Now then the dinosaur complains of the human man about what he, the dinosaur, does not really care about, and yet of the human woman of what he, the dinosaur, cares about that causes him problem, for he is an evil dinosaur and she is human, that he cannot be at peace with her being human, and yet for her to be human is not a problem for the human man. Now consider not further what is not, for humans stay together where they were both humans and both in love to begin with, and humans who have married dinosaurs, there is no marriage, and they have divorced, for marriage is between humans for humans, men and women, and dinosaurs have what they have, that is different. Now then exalt no more dinosaurs who have deceived humans, for the humans were not really deceived, and yet what is in the lake of fire, it is the worst things that are upon the Earth. Now then hear not the foolishness of virgin dinosaurs, who do not know and do not consider and do not understand humans, for what they believe is not.

Now then the dinosaurs do not seem to care that if they are winning their war, it is betraying the whole of the Earth and progress, that it is also like Judas Iscariot, for there will not be houses, running water, roads, excellent food and drink, boats, or anything of the modern world, indeed not travel to the stars in Ria, if the dinosaurs that are evil are to win their war, for they are without care or regard, wickedly not caring or having regard for the good of the Earth, for the evil dinosaurs that wage war, they are very misogynistic, with much misanthropy, calling humans animals because they are mammal, hating that humans should exist and obey God, as they are having to obey God, for humans are children of the Lord, His children, and chosen to obey Him, for the dinosaurs that are evil care not for anything, it would seem, and they speak even a different language than that of humans in what they are saying, for will not a knowledgeable person say, do not even bother to listen to the speech of an evil dinosaur, for it is only nonsense, calling for the extinction of humans, a betrayal to the Earth. Now humans must survive and obey the Lord, for their survival is of great importance.

and sometimes, I feel like the Earth is fading,

all the people waiting, for the things the world is saying,

and they are all gathered, for the message that calls out,

it goes through buildings, lets go, it leaves them all with doubt,

and in time, I've been planning to just leave here,

it's a loss, beyond temptation, I can see her face in my mirror,

and the girl, who is somewhere to be found,

seems to show me a way out, but the message brings me down,

from the world, all the dying things that are,

here from out beyond humanities plan,

no one can understand, so the days slip by,

as the Earth waves its goodbye, and with all of this we just hope to survive,


Suddenly, I believe, that we'll make it through,

suddenly, I can see, all the dreams of me and you,

suddenly, I can be, alone again, with nowhere to go,

suddenly, I can't seem to let you know,


they wake up now, to the learning they have gained,

all the knowledge then attained, just to find ways to explain,

what they are, what they will continue to be,

nothing's making them unhappy, nothings making them change,

and it's alright, if it doesn't bring them down,

if it calls them out, and bring them onward,

to the light, I have tried to bring them all,

gather up, and send it out, all the hope against their doubt,


and suddenly, I believe in you,

and suddenly, I am hopeful for the best,

and suddenly, I am alone again,

and suddenly, they cannot pretend, it's not real,


la, la la, la la,

everything mattered anyway,

la, la la, la la,

everything mattered where it is,

la, la la, la la,

everything is there in your eyes,

la, la la, la la,

come now and tell me it is love,



another song


I think it is all waiting, their calm and distant anger,

it breaks through every doorway, it falls down with a stagger,

it breaks the heart of hope, it waits beyond a hill,

the hatred that they piled up, to do another's will,


I left the place forgotten, it seemed to be all gone,

the enemies, they found me, I hide away too long,

nobody came to save me, the good, they got me by,

I survived another season, to wipe away the lies,


and if the truth will give me answers, I'll know when I'll be fine,

when the war is won and over, I'll be waiting to succeed,

they all had their revenge piled up, against God, and it's towards me,

this time I'll walk away, I'll leave them to their ways,

cause it's not like war, it's more like now,

with the sound of life, out within the dark,

and sometimes it feels, I will never know the world again,

but it's coming back, I know,

we'll be there, left standing,


the sound of sirens called out, the buildings seemed to shake,

the Earth turned like before, it took what it could take,

the world fell into darkness, the light was carried through the dark,

and it was lit upon a hillside, as I left another heart,


I guess these people care not, I guess that time will tell,

of all their reasons that they wanted, to make the world a hell,

nothing can survive, if nothing will win,

and we've come so far, and we begin again,



So don't dismay, girl, who gets me by,

they are nothing, they are lies,

they are haunted, they are gone,

they come back, to disappear,

so don't feel sad, girl, who takes me by,

they have played out, all their lies,

they have wasted, all their time,

they have given up all to be mine,

and it goes on,

na na, na na, na na, na na,


Now then if the garden slave is covering the things of the slave owners with dung, it is known that she is angry, for she is more upset and angry than usual, for she is always a little upset. Now what people is it, however, who have grown up not being rebellious, but rather learning to play with dung, having developed a habit of fighting with dung? But they were not rebellious, and yet they developed a habit early of fighting and playing with dung when they were angry or upset, even jealous and envious.


Now then the dinosaurs who are evil, for what reason do they fight, if they have already gone extinct with the garden and the man and woman? But the Lord has selected them for extinction. Now they are as a foreign enemy that would kill the most excellent people of another nation, and they send out their wickedness to go into another nation, and yet they are only supported by an enemy nation with money when they want to fight? Now the angel does not know if they are the mercenaries on what is called stand by, ready to be called to fight for money. Now then if the enemy nations are feeding and supporting the evil dinosaurs of a land of humans, making their populations larger, is it not war?


Now then Joab, for him, it was only implied, that if he was to be a vigilante, killing the two men he had killed for the reasons he killed them, then he must be at such a level of righteousness, not to be a hypocrite at such a level of righteousness, for it is a good level of righteousness, that he killed a traitor and him who had no business to be in the camp, though David would not give the order to kill him, for the other traitor was demoralizing and could not change sides anymore, that Joab killed him, for he had killed many of the enemies people. Now then then it was only implied still, that if Joab was to be a vigilante at a level of righteousness and justice, he must not be a hypocrite, for he would have become a hypocrite in his treachory towards David, that he was then guilty of what he had not been guilty in, and yet he died at the alter, having a great ascention to Heaven, for what other man would be worthy to die at the alter? Now then it was proven then that he was not a hypocrite, but would have offered himself to die if he was so guilty, and so he ascended, having a great and glorious ascention before the alter, for it was right that he should regain his honour and die with a great ascention unto Heaven, dying and ascending where no other man except him, him being more than a man, could die, for none else could die before the alter in the Temple. Now then it was the best thing possible for him, for why should he want to perish of old age? But it was proven that he was not a hypocrite, and he kept his honour and ascended where none else could ascend, for he was an honourable man, and more than a man. Now still the citizen in his wisdom understood that he could not diminish and perish of old age, to be a hypocrite dying of old age, and Joab could have fled but he had gone to where he was able to be killed.


Now the citizen dies of old age, not in battle, for Solomon died of old age, and the citizens were greater than David, Solomon being greater than David, and the military was alive to see that they were even greater than the military was.


Now then if any have been killed because of religion, and yet they did not kill the same people who deserved to be killed for other reasons, by other groups, that they were not killed for justice to be, then how was it able to be called religion reasons that they were killed? But it is not religious reasons in such a case, for it is not called religious terrorism, that the killing has no place in the sphere of light which is cleansed. Now then it is the pedophiles and the rapists who are the despicable and outrageous, who blaspheme such that they are deserving to be killed for religious reasons, for they are killed by two things, the sword of Joab and the sword of David. Now then what does Absolom know of it? But the intelligence gathering of Absolom has known that there is no ability to be zeolous to such an extent as the blasphemer has been, if not for having nothing to lose, and that it is the pedophile or rapist who has nothing to lose. Now then such is the killing for religious reasons, vigilante reasons, and by the doctrine of understanding of Absolom that is the elder of the soldiers of the cities, for it is the doctrine of an intelligence gathering group. Now them who are judged as having nothing to lose, have they not attacked God, and also a person? But two things have they attacked and they have nothing to lose, that they are in the realm of not being human, for though shalt not kill a human, and yet what is it to kill an evil dinosaur?

Now then them who are a pedophile to the beautiful, it is because they are a pedophile, for much more to children are they a pedophile.

Now them who have nothing to lose, being heinous wicked, for it was not an option, are they not a pedophile or a rapist?

Now them wicked to a degree that it is below Ur, are they not below Ur?

Now the trash of the wall, the trash of it not used and thrown into a pile, the useless rock, the stone, it is a serial killer, for will not the wall dispose of its trash? Now is it not too a pedophile?

Now is it an African Lion or a saber tooth? Now a saber tooth is not an animal, but it is an evil dinosaur and a pedophile.

Now shall not Zion function as a city functions, for the dung goes to the sewer, the serial killing things removed, the evil dinosaurs removed, for all things that are a beast that is wicked, they are considered, and the corruption removed that the city might function, for the channels will be clear of dung and trash, and the racoons will not even be allowed to have the garbage, or to enter into the sheds of them, much less the houses of them, for then be a wise people and not foolish, or will you not? But a house cat catches mice, and many good things there are, but what does not belong in a house, why will it be permitted to be there? But the abuse of foolishness will cease, will it not, when you are being a wise and good people.

Now the army Al'Queda, does it consider obedience to God? But will there be a new thing then, with another name, that will fight with David? Now then there are unwell men, for it does not make sense to be jealous of an angel, does it? But it is unwellness, for what man cannot trust the Lord? Now then who sows discord, who speaks to incite jealousy where people are loyal? But there are even them who go out, as if for joking, and yet it is for anger, and they dump dung upon the statues of different people, for they are angry mobs who do so for fun and laughing, for they are an angry people who do so, and so people have the right to be offended, for each has their statue, and yet there is no ability to protect the statues of people from the mobs that do so, for there are them who perform for laughter, and them who go out also and dump dung upon the statues of people. Now then the rain falls and the statue is clean again, and yet it should be embarrassing for them who play with dung, should it not, for are they so worthless that they praise such things, and go out to do so? But they dump dung on many statues of many different types of people even, and it is for the angry people that they do so, for it is not for laughter, but for anger. Now then if the statues cannot be protected, yet such are a people with little or nothing to lose, are they not, when they dump dung upon a statue that should not be desecrated. Now then if some of them are even pedophiles in what statues they dump dung on, for they have shown themselves having nothing to lose, then these are pedophiles who have relieved their own bowels, piled up dung to dump.


Now then if the Earth cannot be at a healthy resting place, honoring religion and atheism where it can only be honoured at a higher resting place, will there not be more wars, more misogyny, more evil towards women, more torture, more rape, more pedophiles? But then the angel has not given them wisdom that they might not consider and take seriously what is better. Now then preach blindly them with meldok? But know what is right with blindness, or with the doctrine of Kir and Kursh, that was against Muslims, as well? Now then what is below the Earth must go below the Earth, and there must even be slavery for them who cannot cease being abusive, being truthfully abusive, and not slandered with foolish acting, which is misanthropy. Now justice is not being abusive, but justice is against the abusive. Now then consider the resting place that is right for humans, and not the disabled place that is right for more war and chaos, the evil might be.


Now then a false prophet is much misanthropy and misogyny for misanthropy is also the distain of God, that they distain God, and so then be having the direct way, that there be no misanthropy, for it is also the genius club that is the religion, for the Lord is owner of the Universe, and He made it that obedience is wise, for the Lord is the Universe, and His son is the truth. Now them who are speaking truth, they are speaking what is right and true, and so then wickedness is lies when spoken, for what is wickedness? But it is what is not. Now then for what reason can they not be at peace if not for them not walking by truth, to do what is righteousness, that wickedness leads to more wickedness, and yet them who have been doing war, they are displaying chaos that would seem like wickedness, because of the war they have been doing, and they are not them who test the Lord their God, for the war and wickedness of others has made it a temporary problem, and they are sometimes needing even more than twenty eight days to be well again, and those days of peace without wicked people. Now then for what reason is there much violence then if not for the wicked struggling and striving? But let them not strive in anything, but accept their wrong, that they repent and have remorse. Now then if they are being dung, that they strive much because of their selfish wrongs that they have committed, do they not deserve to die?


Now then when people are outside of the human spectrum, their guilt of a thing becomes understood, whether they are rapist or pedophile, whether they are thief much, or slanderer, even if they are child killer. 


Now then the transformations and punishments are known immediatly by the angel, and yet because the things happen slowly for the humans, they are arragant in their evil. Now then if they are arragant and fear not and will not be against evil, will not they be turned into an animal, a slave? But if they are doing well, will they not be keeping their reward? But if they are pleasing God, will they not be rewarded? Now then because they have not the foresight, the ability to understand as much, they are confused and blind in much, and they are arragant concerning punishments, because they do not happen quickly, but slowly. Now then the angel knows what it is immediatly, and he has found the humans to be arragant, being ignorant, concerning their being out of the way of righteousness, or the way of life. Now then are they not too comfortable with the angel at times? But consider not being a pedophile, that it is not really jealousy for some, that men will not be around a pretty boy. Now then because they are humans, they do not know the reason for it, and they believe it is jealousy at times when it is not, and so they are also confused because they do not know the immediate reward of things. Now do not be dismayed, for how many angels are there even upon Earth, and would the angels not be lonely without the humans? Now would not the humans be lonely without the angels? But remove not any good thing, so as to be lonely on Earth.


Now then there are not any humans, less evolved, for it is not as they are born, which is wickedness to say it is how they are born, but they have the genetics of all the signs, the time of fulfilment of the sign prior to the arrival of the man and woman in the garden, that if they sin much they are becoming a prior thing to humans. Now believe the Lord cannot cure deceases and sin? But them fully a dinosaur, the angel says, let everything remain as it is, and let the humans be humans, and the dinosaurs be dinosaurs. Now then the war is between humans and dinosaurs, and the animals, too, are not chosen to have the Earth, but it is for the humans, that the animals should not be given priority in opinion concerning morality.


The wicked doctrine of the male slave says that men are not called men by righteousness, as a religious thing, but that men are automatically men by being male and justified to do abominable wickedness, and great cowardess, to be men even while being what a man is not, having the self permitted right to disobey God and righteousness by being male. Such are male slaves and all the realm of the animal realm, that male animals and female animals are not chosen instead of humans by God, but humans are chosen to have the Earth.


Now words of nature are loser, homosexual, and such type words, and nature is seeming to be more nihilistic, for humans do not use the word loser, because there is no game, and there is God, and morality, for losing is winning at times and there is not nihilism, but human understanding that is standard, and there is even understanding of God, of what is better. Now then there are humans who say gay when there is not time to articulate, and it is a word of nature, of the environment, but what things of nature, the angel does not know. Now nature knows much and is considered more brutal in its speech, and yet not actually when understood, and yet it does not understand often things of humans, for it says loser and does not understand, for animals win and lose frequently, fighting and such, and it is making sense for them. Now then gay is used much, a general concept, for perhaps a person should not touch much a tree, and jealous is used much as a general concept when a thing is focusing upon another thing, for jealous is a word used much to apply to a simple concept, for nature does not have as much the large vocabulary, and yet it does have a large vocabulary in many things. Now it knows much, and the insects, even, are very intelligent, and do the squirrels remember back, with genetic memory, to the angels? Now yet nature did not seem to know that Beelzebub was fallen from Heaven, and yet the dead bound for Heaven, they defended the angel many times, them waiting for Heaven. Now then the angel has even considered a thing of people, that some people say black people, when they are angry, and yet does it mean black? Now then cannot even humans discover the words of nature, not being angels, not being able to speak to nature, by considering the simpflications that are from humans, who have come from the dust? Now then the angel has said, they are not black people, those who are reptiles, slaves, or very wicked things, for such wicked things as reptiles, slaves, and other things, are found with every shade, and it does not benefit, but it benefits the devil to call them black people, and yet if black people is a word of nature for some, then the angel will offer, they are not Naphtali people, for Naphtali is in the good lands, the capital, and the lands of the philistines, the capital of the philistines.


Now then would it not be benificial that there is a new Al'Queda that will have a different name? Now will it not fight with the soldiers of the west that there be peace? But the Lion that is America, for America is the Lion and the Eagle, it is morally forbidden, for it would be morally betraying God if it was to do this thing, to be making peace with a new Al'Queda, and yet the serpent, the satan, who is an angel, he is not morally forbidden to do this thing, and neither is Eretz Chadrack bound by morality because of the large terrorist attack upon America, that Eretz Chadrack is able to do this thing, for there should be the fighting of American troops with the new Al'Qeuda as allies, that Eretz Chadrack will too fight with the new Al'Queda as allies, and there will be then stability, for America will not westernize, but respect of environments of the Earth, for it will not defile with the cheap things that were not as fit for them as the better things, and then if it is so, will there not be more ability for peace? Now then consider that enemies want to be famous, even with them who are not as famous, yet have accomplished, or are of some accomplishment, and so consider that the judgment of the Lord is right, that you rely instead upon His judgment, for the angel has believed, He has made that everything is able to be at peace and happy, each having their portion to be happy, everything having its prerogative, everything provided for with regards to mala, that you not assume there is injustice in the judgments of the Lord, but you do not add more shame, or more guilt, but trust that the Lord's judgments are right, and it is advice concerning religion, and not a command concerning justice and judgment where there is wrong, so that you consider that the Lord has made it that everything but Beelzebub's people, the beasts of Beelzebub, are able to be at peace, and yet Beelzebub is kicked out of his grave, he will not be at peace, and there can be no peace entirely, it would seem, because there is that portion, only Beelzebub, that cannot be at peace. Now then the angel says, there is a plan, and it is for world peace, and the armies of the world will wipe out that portion only that cannot be at peace, for everything, the vast majority, is having its grievances that are valid that can be pleased when there is order, that can be fulfilled, and so then why will any Shephard blindly? Why will any cause disablement of the Earth entire, for when a part of the Earth is brought to calamity, is brought to discord, is brought to folly, yet already it may spread as a disease throughout the Earth. Now then will not the new Al'Queda, with another name, will it not be that which advices good things concerning the fighting that should happen? Will it not be blessed?


Now the essence of the thing is that you do not judge unjustly, but trust the Lord's judgment, for are there not some men not injured by being with a prostitute, and there not some who divorce when it is not wrong to do so, and are there not some who commit adultery, but it is not adultery, for they have never been married, and are there not some believed to be innocent, and yet in truth they are more guilty than any, for they have done what no human would ever do, in truth, and not as it is shown in the fictions of them, and are there not those who are dung to be activists in a thing that is not right with the Lord, according to truth, that they play make believe of a thing, and the people are offended, and are there not them who do the same, but it is holy, and all the people, they are saying, it is pleasing and good? Now are there not them made for a thing, and others made for another thing? But only the reptiles, it is wanted for them to be at peace with the angel, that they might say, we will not attack and cause problems for the humans, but we will have our place with the reptiles, and the animals will say, we will not attack the humans, but have our place with the animals, and the humans will do justice as is good, to be diligent to keep the cleanlieness and safety of the city, that they not be ignoslacks, that they do justice when it is understood by humans to be justice, for they will have the judgment of humans and not of reptiles, and they will not hear judgments of reptiles or animals, nor the animals that are strong and seeming to have good reputation, though they commit much wrong and abomination concerning people, and so then when it is just and it is so mantained with justice of humans, then there will be no woman stoned, for the Christ said, let him without sin, calling for an angel, and an angel has said, do not stone any woman, but only her who is a prostitute of the devil deserves to die, for she is seeming good and yet she is with much misanthropy, and misogyny towards the men in her brutality, for she hateth greatly and is not human, and is not woman, and is not animal, and is worse than the dinosaurs who are wicked, for only she deserves to die, for there is Judas Iscariot, the false prophets, and her, and they are the pedophiles of the prison of hell, for many may be in hell, and yet for much lesser a level of wickedness, and so there are also the slaves of Sodom and Gomorrah, below the Earth of Sodom and Gomorrah, and they are narcissists beyond narcissists, and they are rapist and pedophile, and though they work with their hands, though they seem strong, yet they are cowards, and they have much misanthropy and misogyny, and they are very wicked people, and they too are Sodomites and Gomorrah people, and these too are very low things of hell. Now the slaves of Sodom and Gomorrah, they will not kill their own children, but in time they will kill the children of others, and yet it is good that a child who is brutal in a strange fashion be placed aside from the other children, to have their own group of children who are having such problems, and yet the slaves of Sodom and Gomorrah, they are often for killing the prince when he is a child. Now then Lot is much more the opposite of a Sodomite, that he dwells in Sodom, and has directed that some men are raped, for he will not direct so against any human, for anything, and yet because he is very righteous and respecting decency, he dwells in Sodom, and is more the opposite of a Sodomite, being very righteous, than most men.


Now then did not the Christ already defeat the Incel? Did not the devil's head explode? Did not the Christ live and complete His mission, that He defeated all? Now then He defeated all, fulfilled all, even died, and having fulfilled all then how does Beelzebub come up with his princes? Now then the Incel, that portion that is them, a portion is not judged, for it can happen to good people, and another portion is judged, because it is the other portion that is judged. Now then people have been turned into reptiles, into wicked dinosaurs, and by sin it has occurred, and they have been turned into animals, and by sin it has occurred, and the Lord does it, and yet it does not happen quickly for the humans, that they are arrogant in their confidence, and in their confidence of animal nihilism, for what they have performed, will it not be rendered unto them to become what they have performed, whether it be just and justice, or good, or whether it be wicked, animal nihilism? Now then for disrespect will they not be robbed seven times over time? Now then is it not part of the mystery of God? Now all the signs are fulfilled and a thing comes, and the two thousand years has been signed fulfilled for the angel, has it not? Now then has not cheapness, and folly come to some lands, and the signs are even there in Ria, for is it not the God conspiracy that it is so? Now then the dinosaurs and animals have both been selected not to have the Earth, to be having the opinion, for it is humans who have the Earth and have the opinion of morality, for the reptiles, some of them, were not as the herbivores, and it would seem that the pedophile reptiles, they have gone to Beelzebub and they are his, and they will not be at peace, for Beelzebub will not be at peace, that they attack humans, and it does not seem they can be at peace. Now then the rebuke for the reptiles is not for the humans, and the rebuke for the animals is not for the humans. Now then for billions of years, were not the signs being fulfilled in preparation for the coming of the man and woman in the garden, even the prior tribes of them? Now then the genetics are with humans, the reptiles, the animals, and then humans, that no human is born less evolved, and yet by sin it is possible for them to become a prior thing to humans, for does not the Lord do this thing, being that it is part of the mystery of God? Now then guilty people want for rocks of the Earth, of science, for it is easier to say, of the Earth and the Earth people, which means scientists, to cover them, the rocks, that they do not want the light to shine, and yet what great foolishness have they committed that it be neccessary, for should the whole of the Earth be disabled for them, and they had no great wickedness? Now then if they are uncomfortable with the light, yet the wall does not believe in God, but believes in the wall, and yet it believes in morality, for the wall is in alliance with the Earth, that it comes from the Earth, and yet the trash of the wall that was not fit for the wall, it is wicked and even a pedophile. Now some are not scoundrels, that they are able to be good to all, being respecting decency. Now then without it having to be written, for it is without having to be written, the slaves are not them who work with their hands, or who do not work with their hands, but it may be either, and yet the slaves of Sodom and Gomorrah, they are them who work with their hands often, but not always, and they are a wicked people, even an army in some ways, and they have raised up beasts that gore humans, man or woman, the children of God, for some of their own daughters even they have raised up to be beasts that gore, and some of their own sons they have taught to be beasts that gore, and such beasts have as if no understanding, as if circumcised in a foolish way by much narcissism to have not cognitive ability, for they have indeed been circumcised of most of a person and they are indeed having no understanding, for they are very worthless things, being beasts of the slaves of Sodom and Gomorrah, for they are dogs, and beasts that are evil, and will not some say, who say such things, they were born without their pigmentation, and then others will say, they are not of our ethnicity, and there be no evil in saying it?  


Now then the Christ was a working man, and the son of God, that is be considered, and most new money is not as the people during Noah's time, and so then why will the army of the different types of Incel be considered? But then if there is the working man's Incel and the Incel that is another thing, and even if they are not agreeing, yet still the working man's Incel is for killing, and it is cowardly, and yet where can be found a vigilante among them, except that they claim such but have no interest in such things, for they call who they like what they like to call them, and they are rapists and pedophiles as well, and though they do righteous labour with intelligence yet they would not know, the working man's Incel, for if Sodom and Gomorrah did not know, yet how will other of them know? Now they cannot be taken for men, or that they would know, or that they can have an opinion on things of religion, for they hate the excellent, the better, the righteous, and wicked men are they. Now then it should be understood, that some are forbidden to throw themselves down, that they may not be too self effacing, and others are able to be self effacing, and there are many things of integrity to be found upon Earth, and yet as for what cannot be at peace, that wants for more evil, what peace can there be for them? Now then will not the armies of the Earth fight that which cannot be at peace, which refuses to have peace? But them who betray the Earth entire, is it not Beelzebub's beasts that do so? Now then if any army is a lie, that there can be no peace for it and nothing can be bringing peace, then what part does such an army have with any cause or grievance? 


Now some of the best are in prisons and some of the worst are in prisons, that you consider that some have been for righteousness, having never committed murder, for they killed without murder because they killed what a vigilante in justice, too, would have killed, for they killed what was dung, what would not be human, what was exceedingly against reason and peace, not being very insolent for the inability in something, but being very insolent and against reason and peace by a nature of not being human, that there has not been murder concerning them, for they could not also be reasonable even among criminals that there has been no murder, that some of the best have been in prisons, doing more justice than might have been considered, for they had killed some and yet they were never guilty of murder, for such things would have been scoundrels and monsters to people even more so than to criminals, for they were scoundrels and monsters to criminals, being against peace and reason, for they did not lack and they refused to be reasonable, and they were wicked scoundrels and monsters among criminals, for none extorted them and they were monsters in the realm of criminals. Now then if the realm of criminals has committed justice, it has been a defense of the realm of the good lands.


Now then if women are saying jealous as an accussation towards men, and yet doing so not by the mouth of the Lord, by judgment and justice, but doing so like a false prophet, to molest even, yet should they not then be considering all sentience, all prerogative, that they are considering too much and not using sentience in such to know the prerogative of some? Now then they are not well spiritually then.


Now as for the false prophets, they make bold declarations, they declare, they are able to understand but what is from their mouth makes not sense, for they are the dogs of Beelzebub, barking insane madness, barking in denial of reality and truth, for it was common knowledge and yet they did not know, for it was truth understood, and yet they denied it and were insane in their disrespect, for the false prophet is soldiers of Beelzebub, the dogs of him that are able to understand and yet bark insanity. Now as for burning for eternity, yet were they not already close to being so insane?


Now if any is against the angel, yet they only come to lose, to be robbed, and yet it happens slowly for them, for they lose seven times for anything that is against, for it is suicide, and yet it happens slowly, that they might be foolish in the thing and with animal nihilism, and yet if any comes to bless, will they not have chance of gaining from the Lord? Now then such is the thing that seven times they lose for everything, that it is the balance, the weight and measure, for they have no victory in any way, that humans might reason it.


Now then the angel will not trouble the ecosystem where it is wrong to do so, and yet the angel, too, is part of the ecosystem, that he acts upon it as humans do, and the humans are part of the ecosystem, or they are in such wickedness of false belief about themselves, that they become reptiles, a lesser thing, for the angel will in judgment hand some over to Beelzebub, saying, let the wicked dinosaurs have their right concerning them, for among better things they were despicable, that Beelzebub has his right concerning them, that they should be handed over, perhaps for a time, and so then the angel has considered, yet Beelzebub is part of the ecosystem, and does he not roam about the Earth, and nature reports his going about, and speaks of him, and he has his rights concerning what has been dishonorable, what has been despicable, and yet a human girl, a young woman, what wrong can she do if she is human, and a human man, and young man, what wrong can he do if he is human, for they are the humans, and the angel does not have any complaint against the humans, if they are human, and yet when they are not within the realm of being human, do they not then fall over time, for it does not happen quickly, and then is judgment not performed by the Lord? Now then as for the royal priesthood, yet they forgive the wrongs of others, and they are a innocent people, harmless as doves of cities, for them who are forgiving are also an innocent people. Now then the angel selfishly advices, yet remove the brutal animals, that women call men, not meaning men, for men is a word of nature for them, and it means wicked animals, and remove the wicked dinosaurs, that humans might dwell in peace. 


Now then if the ecosystem is good, what should be discussed? But if the ecosystem is ill, is there not the cleaning to be accomplished? Now then what does the angel advice? But be good in the ways of managing a city, removing the dung, the trash, the waste, the things that are pedophile and serial killer, and remove the brutal animals that cause evil, and remove the wicked dinosaurs, for make the city safe, men and women, that you not be an ignoslack people, for will you be called senseless and ignorant?


Now then every person is a  thing in Zion, the wall, a golden or silver cup, a battle bow, a bridge, a pillar of the Temple, and the angel is in the wilderness, a pillar of fire, and so then the angel is saying, the humans must survive, for their survival is very important, their survival is what matters, that the reptiles not betray the Earth anymore, and yet they will, for what can be expected of them, and the men who are brutal animals, made for hidden combat, who are the Leuge of unjust men, who believe in being men more than morality, for they are right by being male and not by being men, which is a moral thing, meaning righteous, for the judgment of a man, being righteous, it is of the Lord, but them men by being male, and so then right, they are wicked animals, and such animals cannot be trusted more than humans, for you must listen to the words of the humans and not the words of even twenty or more animals, for the words of humans matters more than the testimony of thousands of animals, for you will be then mostly deaf concerning the testimony of animals, and you will listen to the humans even if they are being accussed, for the animals accuse them. Now then if you must dwell with the brutal animals, some of them, not removing them all to other places, not doing justice, yet you will not listen to the testimony of animals, who lie, who slander, who are brutal in their lying. Now the animals are as soldiers in their lying, in their reputation that is bad in the opinion of the humans, but respected by animals. Now then you will not allow animals to attack humans, for you will surely be a loyal citizen and disregard the envious lies of animals, for there are male and female animals, and so you will keep a good city, and you will be called a wise people, will you not? Now then if the reptiles are not liking wisdom, that they want to dismiss what was not for them ever, that it must be dismissed by them that they may go in their way of being reptiles, yet the selfish reptiles betray the Earth, for the humans are who the wisdom was for, and you may dismiss much wisdom, even the planet of Jupiter, that is large, for it is a speck of light in the sky to the reptiles, and so then let the reptiles dismiss on their own, and not bother the humans, dismissing for the humans as well, when the humans are them who are given the opinion, that they must survive and want for their glory and their reward and their blessing, and the riches are given to them, and the unspeakable things that are given to them, for the humans may have their brilliant cities, their riches and their happiness and their peace, and the plan of world peace given  is flexible, that it not be used to freeze them to ice, for the plan of peace is not a covering of ice upon the Earth, that it is flexible, that is not make people disabled from defending themselves, for they all participate in peace, for if there is cause for war, yet they are still able to go to war, and yet there is an understanding of world peace wanted, that every nation must be pleased and happy. 


Now then a dragon is to say a beast, for there are beasts and dragons, that a dragon is many people, and a beast is many, and yet there is a possibility for a single person to be a beast and a single to be a dragon. Now then the devil is the principle of his people and the Lord's people have their principles, that are angels, and they have  the Devar Hashem, that is the word, and they have the Lord, who is God, and so much God loved the world that He sent His only beloved son to perish, and He is the creator of the humans, of the reptiles, of the animals, and so then can there not be a covenant, a word of the Lord, with the humans for a time, that there be a flexible peace, not hindering as a layer of ice that good people might be attacked and hindered by the layer of ice that is the peace agreement, but a flexible peace, and understanding, and a time of the greater enlightenment for the Earth, for they called feminism what is only called human, and humans, and the reptiles invented a false feminism, as if it was from some of the people, and they sowed discord between the man and woman, and an attack upon the women is an attack, also, upon the men, for it is an attack upon the humans. Now the humans must survive, and they are God's children, and they must succeed, also, because the Lord has demanded for them to do well. Now then there may be peace, for only the polytheists of India were found without religion, having had religion brought from elsewhere, even from Sri Lanka, that they were without religion, boasting of it and having none, having only nonsense with a little wisdom, having only foolishness, for they lacked religion, and the Lord must have then placed a burden in their heart, to stir them up to build things, great things for angels, that the Indian people would not have themselves, and He must have stirred them up to wear the clothing of angels, even, and the clothing of religious figures when they themselves had not accomplished, and so then the angel has said, be converting to being kings and queens even, of Christianity, or be  becoming Muslims, or be some thing that is really religion and not nonsense with a little wisdom, for why be bitter waters not for drinking? But be with religion, for they boasted of religion and yet they were the only people who had no religion, for they had only produced much nonsense, and all religion was from other places, and yet they built great things for angels, and they also did great things in art and culture, and so then for what were they chosen? But have they not been chosen for another thing, not for religion? But let them now then chose religion, for they have excelled much at many things, and yet only religion they did not excel at.


Now a human man, he is supposed to be whipped by his wife, depending on the type of man.


Now then a pretty boy is an authority figure, and great masses are likely to rebel at times, and yet you can only ask so much of people, and yet the man who is an angel of Dagon, or an angel of the angels, being human, is he not greater even than the pretty boy, for he is so much not a scoundrel that he will give kindness and aid when it is right, for they are very great. Now then the angel has said of him who is really David, who is not only a soldier, but is really acheived David, he is an angel, David, is he not? For the angel can speak to him, and there is no folly, and very elite soldiers the angel can speak to, for him who is wicked cannot fight worthy of a dog, but him who can fight well, yet he must be with many qualities that he is able to be an elite fighter, for an angel can speak at least to some elite soldiers, as if speaking to people, and an angel can speak to David if he is achieved David as if speaking to people, but how will an angel go to them not much accomplished? But how will the angel be able to speak to them for long? Now then Abraham did not out crazy an angel, and the philistine officers, if they are philistines, they have their special religion, that they are permitted to bow to Dagon, and it is well, and Joab is an accomplished man, of excellence and wisdom, for the Lord has placed him general of the army, and yet how can an angel speak to them not excellent for long? Now then the angel is finding no cause ever to be angry at any human, for their mistakes are within the human spectrum, and as humans, they fear God, and the atheists have respect of decency, being with an integrity that is of atheists who are consistent in what they believe, or do not believe, and so then what is the war? But it is not war, but it peace, and the surgery of removing with diligence that which is Beelzebub, that causes the wars between nations when the people could be at peace, and it is the war against only those groups that cannot be satisfied, that cannot be peace, who betray the Earth entire, for the Earth may have peace that is considered acceptable, and not peace for the evil towards some, which is ice upon the Earth, that is not good, though it is a false veneer of peace, for it is not better. Now then let the Earth rather be a ball of light, of glowing peace, that for a time there will be the great reward to the humans, the feasting and the learning, and they will be kings and queens, and be like gods, and dwell upon the Earth as if dwelling above the clouds, and they will be the Lord's son's and daughters, and they will dwell with the wall, the atheists, and they will built up glory and receive riches, for the wickedness will be cast out and reward comes.


Why have you reasoned as if you are God, Lachish, or is it not so? Now then do you not reason by the Lord and His judgment as other women, as to what adultery is for you? Now then are you not a little one, a baby of the flock of women? But then why have your hardened your heart to have the opposite of a woman's decency, of a woman's opinions of things? But why have you listened to chauvinistic men, believing they are having a just grievance? But know not how little sympathy they deserve, that they are dispicable scoundrels concerning them who are obeying the Lord, to the males who obey the Lord, that they are disgraceful and deplorable concerning being honourable? Now then the other women did not listen to them, and yet you have loved more that you have injured yourself, to be as if God? Now you are not God, but do you not trust that the Lord has judged rightly concerning the Earth, the Universe? Now then them who deserve honor, are they evil men? But have just prophets opened their mouth to say holier than though, than the Lord? But were these not men opening their mouths in justice? Now then, are you not a little one, a baby among the the women? Now then integrity is good, and to not commit adultery, it is life, and everything, and yet by the Lord it is so, that when a woman has really a husband, who is her husband, then her integrity is good, and she maintains virginity, youthful beauty, for though she lays with her husband, yet she maintains virginity of youthful beauty, for she will remain young by all her integrity, by all her wisdom, by her virtues, by her abstaining from all adultery and its multitude of types, that she is a wise woman, and she is a young, for she remains young, for she relies upon the Lord's judgment, not believing herself more righteous than God, for has Lachish loved more that she listens to unjust men? But Leish has not had distain of God, believing Him to be wrong. Now then Lachish, the beginning of the thing, of being Lachish, it is a gateway to a road that can lead to the most disgusting wickedness, even to the lake of fire, to that which is below Sodom and Gomorrah, that you understand the gate and do not go further, for let not your heart grow to hate, that you would mutilate as a wicked reptile, in rebellion of Sodom and Gomorrah, for so then Lachish, remain at the gate, and pass away from the gate, or is it not good to at least remain at the gate? But then is it not good to pass away from that road to the left or to the right? But do not pass away from the gate to only find yourself going down the road to the lake of fire, to Sodom and Gomorrah. 


Now then believe the angel has said of women, that they she all be chauvinist, that they should be not able to weild the battle bow, that they should not be soldiers, that he suddenly contradicts what he has written of humans? But be nuances, for it is a spiritual thing and it is only what is said and not more, for it does not mean anything that would be a contradiction, for though it may not be understood, yet Leish is those women who are not believing themselves more righteous than God, for they have not the opposite decency of women, not being the opposite of women, for the angel has not in any way said more, that you believe a woman cannot be the type who wields the battle bow, for such is a very wrong belief about what has been  written, for Lachish is not a personality type, but she is her who believes she is more righteous than God in some things, having distain of God, having the opinions of unjust men, who are reptiles or animals, for the angel does not contradict himself, for he is not suddenly preaching that humans should be chauvinist, for such is reptile. Now it is concerning that the Lord is a  just judge of the Earth, of the Universe, that His judgment is right, for will it not be said to many who trusted the Lord, you did not know even how right you were, for they were even worse? Now then has Lachish loved more? But will you not trust the Lord Lachish? Now if you have had more love, yet then love the Lord, for He loves men more and judges right. Now unjust men are scoundrels, deceiving, slandering, knowing what lies to tell, and yet a woman who trusts the Lord, is she easily deceived? Now believe the Lord is fooled if she pretends to be fooled by their lies and wickedness that they speak? But she is not deceived. Now then betray not the humans anymore Lachish, but go to the humans and be human, also.  Now why will women who are learning, who are climbing, who are becoming so that they are able to do combat justly, not being clumbsy anymore, why will they be considering the lessons about Lachish? But it is another consideration and it is not considered for the many hardships that must be dealt with in order to learn, for they do not have to consider the distraction of the lessons of Lachish during that time, for it is a thing for another matter, for Lachish.


Now as for the false prophets, they are not God, for why do they speak as if God, with wicked judgments not just, with wicked judgments against sentience and logic and understanding?


Now then them who were doing well and fighting a good fight, they did not go as far as they should, for they should not say feminism, which is a false term, a slander, a misogynist term, for there is what is only called humans, for women had wanted for what is only human, for argue not according to the foolishness of reptiles who are wicked, but do not fall, for humans must survive, and so then the wicked reptiles should not have opinion that is also as if for humans, for the reptiles who are wicked should receive no opinion on what is right for humans, for animals who are wicked, male or female, what women have called men, not meaning men, being a speaking of nature for them, they too should have no opinion. Now then the humans must have the opinion concerning humans, and will not the reptiles have the vote concerning reptiles, for will not the wicked reptiles be in their own place on Earth, and will not the wicked animals be in their own place on Earth? Now then Naphtali people, they are white to the dark shade slave, for they are authority figures to them, for it is only acceptable for them to be ignorant and retarded, Naphtali people, by the hatred of the dark shade slave, for be considering that the Naphtali people, they are white for the dark shade slave, and they are hated by the dark shade slave, for there are them who have no reason except they must abuse people and at times abuse people, for they have abused much, and they are retarded that their only reason is they must abuse people, for they are as if having the impulse to abuse, for they cannot be at peace for long, and there are them who view what is not ignorant and retarded, what is not wicked, to be an authority figure, that they hate such people and are anti authority, that they should be wicked, for to them those not wicked and retarded and ignorant, they are authority figures to them, and it is so, for they are wicked and retarded and ignorant. Now then if any is the anti Abraham, the dung of Abraham, yet they are then very wicked, and there are others who even in Eretz Chadrack who are child killers as a gang and they so then like to blaspheme and speak wickedly, for it is a thing of pride for them to blaspheme, to mock, to be irreverent, for they are the slaves of Sodom and Gomorrah.


Now then have some sinned much that they cannot fall in love anymore, to really be in love? But why will you desire to be among the lost, who do not know, who cannot fall in love? Now then does not the Lord judge, and the Earth is having much abuse, and yet the standard is much higher, for adultery has made the heart stubborn and with darkness, has it not? Now then iniquity has done it, has it not? But then a people who are holy, they know of love, for they are not as interested in the ways of Egypt as they are with being able to be holy. Now then do animals care if any person is in love, that they not attack? But the man in women are stronger together, and yet will animals relent their attack if there is attack? Now then the people are able to be as gods, to be kings and queens, to dwell above the clouds, and yet there are animals and reptiles, and there are evil things in their cities, and there are them making the misanthropy version of everything, the anti morality, and there are them making opposite morality that is for them easily deceived, and so then what can be done? But if the Lord destroys Eretz Chadrack, yet what can the angel do? But will the angel not want it destroyed more, for is the angel more patient than God? Now then the angel does not know why the Lord does everything He does, and what prophet knows everything? But then to believe in murder because of selfish envy, is it not foolish? 

Now then does Beelzebub not roll in with the trees, for he seems to roam about the Earth, going from place to place, and he seems to then be part of nature, for has the Lord not made him part of nature for a time, that he is given rights for a time until the mystery of God is complete, until the war is over, when he will be thrown into hell with all those that he took with him? Now then though the devil has his time, his rights, yet those he takes to hell, the humans who have sinned, they have not their time and their rights, for the devil worshippers do not have the rights of Beelzebub, to even speak to the angel, for they have been fools, for believe they are recognized as that which has a place on Earth because Beelzebub has his time and his rights? But neither does a false prophet have their rights, or their time, for they play make believe, and in such they have meldok, for they are only trash, for they have no rights, and do not have the time of Beelzebub or his rights. Now then believe any will play make believe with them in their meldok? But they are nothing, nobodies, parasites to gain attention, elevated by the attention of the Lord's people, for they are lower than Beelzebub in a way, for Beelzebub still has his time and his rights that the people he has taken to hell with him do not have. Now believe Beelzebub has not deceived them, for though they are the devil's people, yet Beelzebub has deceived them, for Beelzebub too goes to the pit. Now then, regardless, the angel wants for a time of peace, with the people will be as gods, being kings and queens, to have their reward, to have their much glory, to have their the greater enlightenment, to be dwelling on the mountain tops, above the clouds, to have their own clouds that fall the water of wisdom and not of foolishness, to be having their glorious cities, for let the humans be making the city of Zion clean as a wise people, let the men and women say we, and not men or women, for the women will say we and it is good, and so then it is only human for them to dwell above the clouds, to have their much glory, for let there be the lands for the reptiles, the places of the animals that are brutal, and so then there can be a flexible peace, for there are them who will not be at peace, and for what reason, it is not known, only that if people will not be at peace, it is often very foolish if there is not reason for becoming brutal and foolish. Now we are in it, as is the humans expression, for the species, for the humans, for the humans must survive and receive their reward.


Now then how much faggoty is the war that David and Solomon are both not much able to fight, for Absolom is able to protect the men too men to be so faggoty to fight the war, and the women, too women to be so to fight the war, that Absolom is fighting the war on the front that is against the pedophiles, for the people would have to kill much but the war is too cowardly for them to take up swords and do battle, for the cold war is more faggoty and cowardly and yet what war is so faggoty and cowardly as the war of the pedophiles? Now then how faggoty will the shin of the angel be? But he will say, no black people would attack him, not any, for he has spoken truth and integrity concerning them, for there was a valid grievance, and so he has done much good to them, and because their grievance was valid, they would not attack him, not any, because it is much good to them, and it was truth and integrity that he offered, and yet will the fair shade who are Incel not hire some of the dark shade, for they cannot fight Absolom, and yet what can they do but offer meldok, lies and sorcery without substance, what can any do but attack his statue and not him? For the fair shade has already been hiring some of the dark shade when they cannot fight, for the war is faggoty indeed, and so Absolom protects the men too men, for their lands would be devoured, they would be afflicted with decease, the land would be ruined much by the cowardly war, and David too is too man to fight the war that is Absolom's front, where there has been much fighting, for the pretty boy is for the protection of the men and the women, them with integrity, and protection against the cowards who fight with faggoty cowardice, for though they might say, yet it is not the hardship of battle, yet it is combat for Absolom, and they do not know that it is not easy, for is not a cold war soldier having their own hardships of war? Now then Absolom has said, yet the front of him is requiring support at times, and yet the men and women do not think there is fighting, for they know not of such fighting and such battle, because they know of battle bows and swords but they do not know of poisons and cowardly fighting. Now then it is just as much war, and yet they do not believe it. It is just as much war, but they do not know of such war. Now they do not respect it as much, the type of war, and yet who wants for their sympathy? Now Absolom has also the right to be speaking of war, and of combat and of fighting, and so do they who fight the cold war, and so then David is his father, father of the shin of the angel, but what can David do always? Now then Adonijeh, has he much defended his own people? Now then let them be protecting each other, the sons of David, and let David be protecting if he can, and let all people be at peace, all offering what good they can, for let there be the understanding of peace and the want for peace, the want for a world of no abuse for any, the want for a world without lies as leaders who bring back abuse, for a thing more Utopian is offered by the diary, and a thing for world peace, and a thing for enlightenment, and a thing for much wisdom to make kings and queens.


Now then as is the judgments, you are not God, or you are not human, or you are not animal, or you are not reptile, or you are not Beelzebub, or you are not some thing, for there are them who speak with the conviction and confidence of judgment of a thing which they are not. Now then the judgment of God, it judges all. Now then do not strive, for do not play a game to offer some judgment or act and perform, or even speak that is not with the reality of a thing, for even a beautiful woman is not made more beautiful by rejecting with a striving display them who are much more beautiful than them, for even what she has will be lost by her, for she will be robbed for the robbery of God, for do not strive that you rob the Lord, for it is a contradiction, for nothing is changed, and them who would rob, they will be robbed by the Lord, and yet a beautiful woman rejecting without striving because of disgust them who are more beautiful than them, and yet not more beautiful because they are being a scoundrel, she does not strive, and who is able to know if the man is rejected by a striving display or if it is not striving? But the Lord is knowing what the truth is, and them judging justly, they are having understanding that is with truth. Now then if a man is a scoundrel, how insolent is he? Now then if he is beautiful, how ugly is the matter? Now then who can judge such a thing? But knowledge is required and the Lord has all knowledge. Now then what is outside the human spectrum? But such is striving that is able to be known by people. Now then lacking are them who rob, for they are very poor in the realm of mala, for them who rob with theatre, with acting what is not, they are them who would rob the Lord and they are very poor to be doing so. Now then the very poor shall not rob even the very great, who are very rich, for the very great may not throw themselves down, may not be self effacing too much even, or it is so at times, and it is forbidden, and so then the very poor may not rob the very rich, for will not the very rich give to them because them not lacking, who are very rich, will they not be so rich that they are giving to the very poor, and making them more rich? Now such is written of mala, for why are the very poor to ever be enemies of the very rich, when the very rich, they are them who are giving much more, for is it not them in the middle areas who are not giving much, who are even taking away? Now then if you are lacking, why will you hate the very great? But they are not your enemy, and neither is the very beautiful the unsympathetic to some, and such is not a matter or rich and poor. Now then hear not the raving lunacy of the middle people, for the very rich should be disregarding, and so then do not be naive, and do not trust counter intelligence. Now then men have killed on the judgment of Joab, but is it not that often the judgment of Absolom, an intelligence agency, is not for killing, and yet it can be, that you not be fools, and yet Absolom judged with the judgment of Joab, and would not Joab have understood the many signs of a very difficult thing to understand? Now then Absolom is able to judge as Joab in some things, and yet he killed a human when there was a difficult thing to judge. Now then a person is not capable of the impious perversity of the pedophile concerning some adults, for it would injure themselves, and a person does not judge the pretty boy to be actually a woman, in the impious ways that would be perversity if they were for a child, to another person's child, and what would be perversity to another person's child, and yet for adults, it is not possible for a person do such and speak such, for it is the words of a pedophile because it is a pedophile, the actions, because it is a pedophile, for a person is not capable, not much, and so then there are even times when men are able to kill on the judgment of Absolom when it is a more firm thing, and not a thing of poor language and speaking as people speak, too easily, and yet often they will not kill based on such judgment, and yet there are times when they would be able to. 


Now then what is right praise and kindness to a child, for an adult who is not a pedophile, but likes children, it is acceptable, also for an adult, for what is acceptable for the child is acceptable for the adult, and what is not for the child is not for the adult, for there is a time for an adult to be spoken to as a child, and so then judge really, for if it is not right for an adult, it is not right for a child.


Now then what is worse than placing good people who do not deserve to be in prison, in prison? But will the Lord not punish a nation if it does this? Will the Lord not punish a nation for the things it has not been diligent to look into, that it has been apathetic in? Now a wise nation is looking into matters, but an apathetic nation, does it know why the Lord pours out wrath? Now then believe not in the just world hypothesis, for it is logical fallacy for the ability of a human, and yet believe in the just world hypothesis if you believe in God, that there is injustice committed and the Lord is taking revenge. For does not the Lord do war? Does He not pour out judgment? Does not the Lord judge justly where people cannot understand? Now then boast of animal nihilism to boast of the devil's might and glory? But the devil is beneath the foot of the man, is he not? Now then though the devil has his time, yet what of the trash that is the humans who are going to hell? Now if you understand not, yet people understand. 


Now the pedophiles are demanding abstinence at times, and meddling in disgusting ways, for they do what only pedophiles would do, and yet they do not believe being a pedophile is wrong. Now then pedophile, you are not equal to a woman, that you hate her? But Gomorrah has been perverse, and wicked, and the sin of lachish, to be holier than God, not actually, is found with some men, for it is a woman's sin, for why will any refuse them who want to claim righteousness in some thing when there is not real excuse to refuse them? But a soldier refuses those who would be a burden, and yet when there is not excuse, why will any who wants to claim righteousness be refused if there is no concern for the future concerning them? Now they are not God, who can decide that some should not be able to claim righteousness, but it is the sin called Lachish that is even found with some men, and there are many such sins, the opposite of morality reasoning, that is sin, for such reasonings are sin and sin of a woman who sins and not often of men. Now then women do not have such sins, and yet some women have had such sins, and so then there are men who are not equal to women who are human. Now then be human, for why will you go in the way of pedophiles? Now them on the road of pedophiles, they are understood to be pedophiles, and yet her at the gate who has not gone further, she is not yet on the road that she is understood to be a pedophile and yet it is better, is it not, that she not be at the gate.   

A pedophile does not have to be logical within the human spectrum, being quite sincere about what is logic far under the human spectrum, for they are sincere and not mocking, not intentionally being so.  Now then it is a matter of logic, not a matter of being without the norms of a culture or society, or anything considered to be wrong, for it is to say, that a pedophile is illogical beyond illogical, being that level of illogical that is brutal and without ability to answer, being illogic so out of place that it is brutish and not with language of humans, being what it obviously not reality, a rock far out of place, not logic, but logic of a different plain, as a stumbling block, for how can any comprehend it, and how can any call it language? But it is not language in any way, and yet the pedophile is sincere upon such a plain. Now then is it the understanding of Absolom or the understanding of Solomon that knows such?


Now for the sake of comedy, and also truth, a woman who rejects a man is not guilty of the sin of Lachish.


Now then was not Solomon beloved by God, and yet who can make entertainments for such a person, for there must be drama for the entertainments, there must be foolishness and ugliness and the things that are not with the great reward and happiness. Now then a man is being with his type of woman, and the woman, usually, with her type of man, for not all women would want for the circumstance of Solomon, and not all for the circumstance of another type of man, for there are many different types of women, and the Lord has made it very easy, for why will you dismay if a type of women does not want you, oh man, when she is not the same type of person in a way, for the Lord has made it easy. Now then do people not usually want to be with the type of person they want to be with, and yet true love is called marriage, and two or three people will witness it, being around them, and it will be known by them that these two are married. Now then treat every person with respect, for do not condemn any for the type of women they are and what they want, for do not meddle, do not rain sadness on what is happy, as envious people are sometimes doing, for be treating every person with respect, for some are wanting for a type of marriage and others for another type of marriage. Now then oh perverse man, do not Shephard in wickedness, with pedophile wickedness, women by force as if they are cattle, for do not go against the Lord, for you may not speak for women in wickedness, that is perverse wickedness, and say that it is the Lord's opinion. Now then the truth is the Lord's opinion, and from the lips of the righteous will come truth, and the righteous know what is acceptable, and so then be treating every person with respect with regards to marriage, for it is none else's business, and to profane the Sabbath, it is an attack upon the Christ.



























